Salt: to taste
"See you every day, running up and down the beach like an out of control love missile man!"
1. Thank the person that nominated you with a link back to them.
Please be aware that William didn't even know what a potter's wheel was before we got there and so I don't think that he did too badly. What do you think?
1 Part Amaretto
He started at the bottom rung, at an Boston Amateur Night run by a man named Sam Cohen. He was only 17 years old. He did so well that soon he was substituting for Cohen as Master of Ceremonies. Another opportunity arose when a a friend named Paul Huckle asked him to substitute for him at Keith’s National, in an evening supposedly presenting “professional talent new to Boston.” Performing as Fred St. James, he was a sensation, although the audience reportedly thought he was a parody of a vaudeville act.
I wanted to bring ice tea to work to counteract the Diet Coke cravings. Couldn’t find the pitcher to make some.
“Fight Against Stupidity And Bureaucracy”
@WalmartLabs, a unit of Walmart Global e-commerce, is the company’s hub for creating platforms and products around social and mobile commerce, and is expanding its operations here.
A little after nine, I got up, ate some bread, and then made my way to the market to admire my handiwork. As I approached, a tall nord named Brynjolf began speaking to me. He told me he could tell my pockets were a little light. I got pissed at the scum, but I spoke a little too quickly. He offered to do a con with me, and after hearing the details, I gladly accepted. All I had to do was lift a silver ring from another Madesi’s stall, which I had already broken into, and then plant it no the dark elf Brand-shei. Easy as a sweet roll. For his part of the deal, Brynjolf distracted everyone in the square with promises of some revolutionary new product he was selling. The suckers went for it without hesitation. Taking advantage of their ignorance, I crept up through some crates behind Brand-shei and dropped the ring right into his pocket. Job well done. The poor bastard was about to have a rude surprise.”
Hate is Love. War is Peace.
Next time I drive through Iowa, remind me to NOT stop at this club.
I see a commercial for the Samsung Galaxy Note and it makes me want one. Anything has to be better than the phone I have now. I want the pen with a brain. I want a dustcloth with a brain, too.
Responsibility:Newborn Babies are dependent on you for a long period of time. These small creatures are so vulnerable that they cannot control their own body; you have to help them in every possible aspect. Some parents think that this dependency is somehow very irritating. You have to forget everything and have to attend your baby 24/7, especially in the first few weeks after birth.
Purple Yam Porter, 7% abv. Brewed originally for Oktoberfest (“Instead of a pumpkin ale, we’re giving our fall seasonal an Asian-fusion spin”), it's a dark ale brewed with purple yams and vanilla beans. The aroma has less roasty malt than you'd expect; it's more like cola with a note of squash. It's thin on the palate, and with the mild vanilla note, again suggestive of a soda. But it's also earthy and autumny, a quality that must come from the yams. Strangely, there's also a slightly minty or menthol note I can't account for looking at the ingredients.Mango Weizen, 5% abv. The Indian mango lassi inspired this beer--and it's evident in the finished product. Lassi is a traditional Indian drink made of yogurt; it's very crisp and cooling. Mango lassis are sweeter and full of mango flavor, but remain light and crisp, also with the intention of cooling. This beer manages the quality by adding a small enough amount of fruit so that the aroma and flavor suffuse the beer without adding much sweetness. It is a perfect summer beer.Pandan Brown, 6% abv. The base beer is a traditional brown ale--it looked and smelled relatively predictable. Added to this are pandan leaves and palm sugar, two ingredients I know nothing about. The pandan leaves are distinctly herbal, but having no basis for comparison, I'm not sure how to describe them. I'd like to drink this beer a few more times to calibrate my palate to it.So what to make of the beers? Two pieces of advice: forget the style names. We're off the normal grid here, and "porter," "brown," and even "weizen" are misleading. I've read a bit of the commentary by other bloggers (of course, they're mostly Oregonians: Angelo, Bill, Da Beers), and this is a common criticism: they're not really porters or browns. Second, it's probably best to try these with as little expectation as possible. I'd like to buy another round of the beers and acclimatise my tongue to the flavors. They're disorienting at first, and one's initial reaction is to reject them. But this is the thing with change--it's always going to seem weird the first time you try it.
This is the kind of modern development I like to see in Fremantle. It is creative, fun and functional, but with total respect for the heritage aspects of the building and location.
The first book at the end is Divergent by Veronica Roth. I loved reading this book so much! I was captured from the first page, and I absolutely can’t wait until Insurgent (the sequel).
Here is your free printable! Enjoy and feel free to tweak it as needed to fit your needs.
You remember that Uber-Cool Brother confessed to losing the 2nd scarf I made him ? Well, the third time is the charm, so he has now received the scarf made from 2 skeins of scrumptious Drops Alpaca (such brilliant prices, very reasonable, purchased from Garn Studio with the aid of my friend Miss.Mags) in the colorway '6834 Dark Petrol' using the 'Flemish Block' stitch pattern; unfortunately, I cannot get the color right in any of the photos - it is really a navy blue shot through with turquoise/teal, not the flat charcoal back color presented here:
Should we write:
JeffJew: Magnificent Twisted Fate.
Afraid of failure?
I turned around in my seat. “Plan?” I stared at Julian confused.
Karen, our homeowner requested that we accessorize her lake home, adding some color but at the same time keeping it simple. The lake is about relaxing, not cleaning!
39If I have taken its produce without payment, causing the death of its owners;
My Heavenly Father is so worthy to be praised. How completely I have failed to recognize His gifts of love! What a painful awareness. Instead, how do I respond? I am a miserable, selfish, ungrateful grump!
FACES
Definitely bacon . . . . . . somewhere.
Do all of the above and you'll get even more chances to win with a total of 17 possible points. Just mention in your blog comment how many points you earned (and how you earned those points). A sample comment could look like this:
Late with announcing the Blog Candy winner...not the other kind of late...sorry to cause any undue giddy shock and awe from relatives and friends :)
but it won’t won’t, at least I don’t believe it will...
A special thanks to these girls for motivating me to finish this project.
Our lives shall not be sweated
Flip, flop. Flip, flop.
Allison Paige 8.2lbs 21inches
In a recent seminar organized to enhance engagement with youths, where several hundred participants comprising representatives from voluntary welfare organizations attended, Dr Yaacob Ibrahim, Minister-in-charge of Muslim Affairs, said that “more preventive and upstream measures are needed to help Malay youths at risk of dropping out of school prematurely or those facing difficulties in school or at home.
Gennady Boyarsky, 34, New York, N.Y.
But Bersih and the opposition are demanding a complete overhaul of a voter roll considered fraudulent and reform of an Election Commission they say is biased in favour of the ruling coalition.
Bonus 2: Jaundiced View: Desire Love Hate Healing Poetry eBook
If you want people to have wings, but don't research the anatomy and physics of everything, your explanation of 'magic' should hold up. If they're using magic to fly with their wings, there should be the attached magic rules: drain vs. free energy. But if they're flying around and not feeling exertion of any kind, I start to disbelieve that aspect of the worldbuilding. I begin to question and doubt the author's prowess, and then I see that they don't really need to fly at all, do they? And then I begin to question plot and character, which leads me to see that Character A could've easily avoided that plot twist by making a better, obvious decision, which leads to everything unraveling. Just because the logic of flying wasn't air tight. (*teehee*)
I have been working on plans for the school year. I need to be a little more specific with Bob's plans because the school wants deadlines and resources and such, at least for his science and ELA. We're doing math on our own (not through homeschool registration; we need to keep him as entirely teacher-directed) because the province decided to drop that math course, but he needs that math course to be able to do the best he can 2nd semester in Math 20 Pure, which the province has not yet dropped. Confusing.
woodpecker
If it is the truth, we get to print it. There are basic elements of a news story that should always be answered. Given the answers to who, where, what, when, and how, the “why” may be discerned. —-read MORE
I’m still waiting for my phone to ring and to hear the dulcet tones of Delta Airlines CEO, Richard Anderson. My story is definitely doing the rounds judging by the marked increase in twitter followers with “customer service” backgrounds. We all accept that there must be terms and conditions in any business contract and airlines are perfectly entitled to design these in such a way as to maintain the sustainability and profitability of their business. However, it’s incumbent on us all to rail against terms and conditions that are farcical and unfair and to stand up for humanised business processes, particularly with corporate behemoths. So, Richard, what about you? When can we talk?
"you will never do anything in life," or "you will never have children."
I used Flourishes "Drummer Boy" French Horn image, that I colored in with Copics, cut out and popped up on popdots. I added Glossy Accents to make it stand out and I used the Spellbinders Renaissance Hearts Pendants die as my ornament base. Then I added pearls from Kaiser Craft and fishing line to hang my ornament.
Raised in the woods so's he knew every tree
And what lies they told us.
“And when the blood of thy martyr Stephen was shed, I also was standing by, and consenting unto his death, and kept the raiment of them that slew him.”
Cashew Nuts(roasted), 1/2 cup
Poet John Betjeman enjoyed the atmosphere of Whitelocks, describing it as “the Leeds equivalent of Fleet Street’s Old Cheshire Cheese and far less self-conscious, and does a roaring trade. It is the very heart of Leeds.”
I can't help but smile widely.
A mashed banana blended with peanut butter equals much more tantelizing flavor than just a banana and peanut butter..
Its a gorgeous Moon shadow mist from Lindys stampgang.
Your beauty is the moon and I can only enjoy you from the earth.
x-ray of osteo arthritic deformed After HTO- knee is aligned
Think about the two other methods to “increase wealth” that Keynes lumped in with pyramid-building: earthquakes and war. Now, sure, after a war or earthquake, there’s plenty of construction to be done. After the Haitian earthquake, Nancy Pelosi actually said, “I think that this can be an opportunity for a real boom economy in Haiti.” New York Times columnist Paul Krugman made a similar error. On CNN, he said if “space aliens were planning to attack and we needed a massive buildup to counter the space alien threat … this slump would be over in 18 months.” Before that, he said the 9/11 attacks would be good for the economy.
The problem is if this is what the designers were after, it's not spelled out enough. The Mass Effect saga hasn't employed the same narrative conventions as 2001. Kubric used film to tell a story in which humanity is the protagonist and the taciturn David Bowman is a stand-in for all mankind. You need to pay attention to 2001 because dialogue was not the primary vehicle for storytelling, image was. In Mass Effect, dialogue was equally (if not more) important than image in telling the story. There was little or no image or dialogue pertaining to human evolution at the end.
Disabled rights campaigner Lord Ashley of Stoke has died aged 89.The former Labour MP for Stoke-on-Trent died on Friday night after a short battle with pneumonia, his family said. Jack Ashley represented the city for 26 years until he was made a Labour peer in 1992. He was deaf for most of his political career.
They all kind-of coordinated, with bits from the Bella paper and Real Red running through each. I know the templates and designs aren't going to win any awards, but they loved it and that is all that matters in the end.
Well its the final few days of school and the kids are getting excited about the summer vacation!!
I'm back in L.A County and across the street from me is a cult. They have been there forever and I AM SO FASCINATED BY THEM. They used to congregate in the front lawn and they would clap NONSTOP for like 20 minutes. I'm not kidding. It was weird but this is L.A so weird is relative. Then the stopping clapped and all members would just meet inside the house. The cult leader and his son are very nice, although they rarely interact with anyone else outside the cult.
--Andrew Murray
This is a still photo from Kanye West’s very controversial video and song ”Power” off of his album “My Beautiful Dark Twisted Fantasy”. On its face, this picture does look very dark and twisted but it is a very intriguing art form. I think the purpose Kanye West chose to use these images in his video was to invoke conversation and debate about why he used these particular images to be a visual presentation of “Power”. The images in this still could have so many different meanings depending on the individual. For example, anyone familiar with the story of Kanye West being part of the alleged satanic secret society “The Illuminati”, this picuture would represent evil and devil worshipping for a believer of “The Illuminati” theory. But I digress because trying to explain the satanic view of this image would be like getting into an entirely different subject. The entire video contains some very powerful images and I believe that he chose these because these images could represent what Kanye views power as. The reason I say that is because he is located in the center of a picture with a light shining down on him and he appears to be overlooking everything that is going on in front of him. Since this image was taken from a video, the first projected audience would be the fans and everyone who listens to his music that are familiar with the album and the song this video goes to. Another audience would be for those who are interested in alternative art forms and consider the video as art. Another large audience would be those who do believe that this video was made to worship the devil and promote ”The Illuminati”. He could have done this purposely to get negative feedback since the entertainment business seems to be fueled more by controversy and negativity then anything else. He knew this video would draw alot of viewers due to the controversy of him being an alleged devil worshipper.
A very important question is whether we can link the idea of the complementary currency to that of a basic income. A particular problem is often raised concerning the co-existence of currencies. Gresham's law which states that bad money drives out the good is then quoted. But Gresham's law was formulated for circumstances different from those which are currently to be found in South Africa. What is probably true is that purchasers will want to spend their complementary currency while traders will want to receive the national currency. To make the complementary currency really work will require active trade-offs and community negotiations. Probably the most important consideration will be that of the backing of a currency. Local or indeed national governments supply health and education services which are paid for by the taxes of the formal economy. It may be possible to offer these services to local communities in terms of the local complementary currency. The individual can then decide which services he or she wishes to purchase with her complementary money. She can also decide that she does not need her basic income money and use it to pay for a service she does want from someone who wants more of the local currency (say to pay school fees). In this way community trading will be set up which will require more currency. This can then be supplied by the local authority in excess of the services it offers.
The only difference is that in 1933, the brewers had something of a captive audience in that everyone who even remotely enjoyed beer was trotting down to the corner tavern to plop a dime or two on the bar for the newly legalized beer no matter that it wasn’t quite ready for prime time. No so today.
Ahlers’ daughter is one of the 23 seventh and eighth graders who make up the lacrosse team.
Ultimatly we ALL have a very creative attitude toward this wonderful 'paper hobby' of ours :o)
Until Tomorrow…
There were some beautiful entries last week for "Honour your Mum" and the winner will be announced a little later.
Last night I was having a small amount of trouble falling asleep, and I saw it coming. I was reading Tar Baby by Toni Morrison and Son was just getting to be a bit less mythic and a bit more human and I wanted to finish the chapter, but my eyes were drooping. This feeling comes quickly with me, I usually am able to recognize it once before falling off the waking coil completely. I will be half-way through a paragraph and find my mind saying weird things to itself. While I’m still reading and even sometimes retaining the information in the book (as the next day, I remember everything) I do not comprehend anything in the moment. I’m usually able to get to the end of the paragraph and then I’m asleep.
Dir. Robert Wise
The politician has a vey ambitious PA that he's sleeping with, although I don't think that's going to last much longer as I think she'll dump him the minute he's not in the lead. She reminds me of that thing they used to say about how Hillary Rodham's husband would have become President, whether or not he was Bill Clinton.
Even more graphically intense games such as Tiki Kart 3D ran without a hitch. You also can use the pre-installed Nvidia Tegra Zone app to take you straight to games optimised for Tegra devices if you fancy something more substantial than Cut the Rope.
It would have been my Stinky's 28th birthday today, in Earth years. It's the second birthday he is celebrating in Heaven. We never celebrated his birthday together. The first year we were together, 2009, he was in Jacksonville and I hadn't moved down there yet because our wedding was still a few months away. I sent him a box of clothes I'd picked out for him, and I think some candy. I joked with him that he was a grandpa-old man because he was turning 25 - a quarter of a century (Yes, that's what I turned this year, I don't want to talk about it!). He loved the clothes, and laughed and joked back about being an oldman grandpa. It was a good birthday even though we weren't together.
We had a nerdy day on May 4th, as it's Star Wars Day all over the world... (May the Fourth be with you) - so the boys got their inner geek on... (Yes, my boys internet names - Chewie and Artoo are Star Wars names)
It starts with a gift, when Ben Ryder Howe’s wife, the daughter of Korean immigrants, decides to repay her parents’ self-sacrifice by buying them a store. Howe, an editor at the rarefied Paris Review, agrees to go along. Things soon become a lot more complicated. After the business struggles, Howe finds himself living in the basement of his in-laws’ Staten Island home, commuting to the Paris Review offices in George Plimpton’s Upper East Side townhouse by day, and heading to Brooklyn at night to slice cold cuts and peddle lottery tickets. My Korean Deli follows the store’s tumultuous life span, and along the way paints the portrait of an extremely unlikely partnership between characters with shoots across society, from the Brooklyn streets to Seoul to Puritan New England. Owning the deli becomes a transformative experience for everyone involved as they struggle to salvage the original gift—and the family—while sorting out issues of values, work, and identity.
Home Alone ... FMC ... 2 AM
I read that States are not allowed to tax Indian Tribal Governments directly but may tax the Indians individually as long as they don't make their cash directly from a treaty.
You never know what will spark creativity, so you have to drink as much as you can from the gushing fire hose of life.
The plant was $3 on clearance at Michael's, and the bird cage was $20 at Tia Pan. I know I don't have anything in it yet, I am still looking for the right thing.
I have a confession to make....I usually let the milk reach the 200 degree mark and nearly boil over onto the stove top (it actually has boiled over more often than not). The first time was purely accidental. I had left the room, leaving the milk unattended, but that batch was one of the smoothest, creamiest ice creams we had ever eaten. From there I just let it happen. Don't necessarily do as I do (it's messy), I'm just saying......
Saturn is dark and cold and dim – therefore blacks, deep blues and purples.
A good several years ago I wrote to J.P. Donleavy in a bout of frenzied, semi-maniacal admiration incited by the reading of The Ginger Man. Nothing came of it, but it felt quite cathartic to despatch a letter to a living writer I admired. Now, having just finished reading A Fairy Tale of New York, I feel like writing to Donleavy again. Or better yet, voyaging to Mullingar to visit him, Taittinger and Bournville chocolates (I hear he’s partial to both) in tow. One day, perhaps.
What many Americans do not know is that the United States of America is composed of separate and sovereign republics, each with its own constitution. What has occurred, however, has been the erosion of states’ rights and with that, the gradual distortion of the nation’s central instrument of governance, the Constitution, to mean anything Congress wants it to say.
Streets Of Philadelphia - Marah (Bruce Springsteen W’93)
Madison is familiar enough with change, and she hates everything about it. Change took her long-term boyfriend away from her. It caused one of her friends to suddenly hate her. It’s responsible for the death of a local along with a host of other mysterious happenings. But when Madison meets a hot new guy, she thinks her luck is about to improve.
To be honest she is good. I was not quite sure of her abilities, but the girl did good. The problem was the other drivers who seemed to want to pile on the pressures, just because the car had an L plate on it.
What inspired me tonight to push myself is John. John is not my husband or boyfriend he is John Coltrane. Jazz music, John’s in particular, just gets me moving. It does wonders for me when I am painting. As I listen and write this post I see that it gives me that same feeling I get when I have a brush in my hand. I get a burst of energy. I would like to share this with you in hopes that it does the same for you. You tell me how John makes you feel. Enjoy!
Yes, it does remind me of the song, but more than that it reminds me that
2) cut them to size: one at 27" long, two at 21" long, and five at 9" long
I stopped for the night when I realized I had painted myself into a y-seam corner (two corners, actually). Improvised y-seams were going to require a little less feeling and a little more thinking than I could muster in the middle of the night. I tackled it this morning, and the block miraculously lies flat.
By introducing Wisse Smit in their (private) family fold, the Dutch royal family continued its long established ties with drugs trafficking which originated with king William I who in 1824 founded the Netherlands Trading Society, in essence a Bruinsma-like organization for trafficking and distributing opium throughout the colonies. The enormous family capital of the Orange family dates back to that illustrious era.
Once all of the pennants are sewn in, measure 9 inches out from the last pennant and then trim. You can use this extra 9 inches of binding on each end to help tie your pennant banner up.
The paranoia of whether or not I was going to be killed certainly made the convention more interesting. The killing made the convention more fun!! Also walking among the thousands of people there giggling to myself because I was participating in the convention on a whole other level that some of them probably didn't even know was there was exciting!!
The white /brown horse was not interested. I offered riches and glory and fame but he was just having none of it. Guess the grass is always greener under one's nose.
1 lb. stew meat
Finally, sharing a link scooped via Doggerel: The Lifetime Costs of a Pet, broken down by type of pet, from fish to feathered and furred species. Mint.com says the total lifetime cost for a single dog is over $25K! How do they break it down? You can take a look for yourself and see if you agree…
Winter is usually like that. However, this year, winter never really came. We have a single half-hearted “dusting” of snow early in the season, then a few weeks of sub-zero temps. We even had a few weeks… yes WEEKS!… in early March where the temp was in the 60′s and 70′s. Maybe it’s all the Game of Thrones that I’ve been reading, but I kinda feel like we’re not quite off the hook. In other words, “Winter is still coming“… (I know, a bit of a long winded set up for a year old meme, gimme a break, I haven’t done this for a couple months) This all translates to a state of complete confusion about growing seasons…
First of all, I'd like to define faith for this discussion. When I speak of faith, I don't just mean that I adhere to a religion or belief system. I mean the deep down feeling, the conviction that I can never deny, that God is real. That He hears my prayers. That He loves and cares about little old me. That He will bless me as I do my best to follow Him. Faith to me means trusting God that He can see things beyond my own vision and that His Plan for me is greater than anything I could dream up. I have faith that Jesus Christ is who He said He is-- the Son of God, the Savior of the world, the Prince of peace.
Honey: You know we'll find something, just have faith.
-frequent postings
Hendersonville FFA engaged more than 250 school children in the PLOW program using agriculture-themed books, farm themed puppets and a puppet show written by FFA members. FFA member Kelly
(a) adds fuel to Israel’s strong claim that it is being cornered by Muslims states,
My instant reaction was – that’s one of the best performances I’ve seen, especially considering it was against India.
Remember that before the death of Christ, the disciples did not want to be seen with the Lord. All fled from Him. Even Peter denied Him three times and the last with an oath. While He was in the grave, they hid themselves, as they were afraid for their lives lest those who hated the Lord would link them to Him and crucify them as well. You may say how little faith they had but we must not point the accusing finger without checking our own testimony for Jesus Christ.
The violence, the killing, the endless murder cases and political unrest…
After the pool party, we moved on to shoes. We were delighted to find that the 1/10 of 1% also has the perfect shoes for people abducted by aliens and returned with delusions of being Tijuana hookers. (And we thought it was just our local mall.)
grins at Beggar.
Bottom 2: Elise, Joshua
I had planned to post this song on Sunday for Easter Sunday, but there just wasn't time. So I'll post it now instead. :) I absolutely love this song. It is my favorite Easter song. I have loved it ever since I heard it during our Living Cross production at church years ago. I was one of the townspeople dancers, and we danced to this song in the aisles with our crowns of flowers and streamers. :)
ancient hill -
Pray for me.
Going back to Romans 11:11, “Through their (Israel’s) fall salvation is come unto the Gentiles, for to provoke them to jealousy.” This, indeed, was the case. There in Jerusalem, the Jews hearing Paul were truly provoked to jealousy. They reacted accordingly, becoming violently angry. Isn’t that what happens when one becomes extremely jealous of another?
What do you want readers to take away from the book?
The so-called philosophically oriented physicists of the 20thC, by contrast, are not terribly interesting in terms of our contempoary philosophical tools. Einstein’s ‘Spinozism’ has been talked about by the likes of Dawkins and Hitchens, as a caveat so as not to be interpreted into religious terms. Having an understanding of Spinoza’s metaphysics, by contrast, is not even addressed. Spinoza’s approach to life was one of emotional calm against the overwhelming and sometimes uncontrollable temperaments that we suffer in life. One of the enjoyments that we can have in life is an apprehension of the unity of nature that is, in his metaphysics, how the nature of our inner consciousness subsumed in no small part to the larger reality as a whole, as well as the underlying propositional language that both support. This may sound mystical, but really, it is a form of naturalism. The two prejudices that Spinoza’s philosophy had were: admitting that his metaphysics was fundamentally correct, and we put scientific development and knowledge on a pedestal. None of this is really addressed in the ‘Einsteinian’ view so bastardised by the atheist popularisers.
TOTAL - £1293
Man, SOD is putting on the full-court press when it comes to excuse making. Here’s what he laid on Holly Anderson:
Is the Word of Wisdom weird? Maybe. Peculiar? Most definitely.
As they grew, having taken care of their every need and watching them change in all sorts of ways, it was important to watch and guide them and be sure that as long as I was in charge, nothing would happen to them within my control. Additionally, I saw no harm in criticizing anything that might harm them or any wrong decision they might make. It was my job to guide them into adulthood unharmed, responsible, and healthy.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to fear this tendency to judgement.
until they clench the damaged night in me:
The Jiriki Kata-Do definition of the three battles of Sanchin leads one to a more comprehensive, eclectic higher state whereby mind-body unification (Zen-Ken-Ichi) is a mere stepping stone. The highest human state is only achieved when the energy of the universe that is external to the human is united and synchronized with the mind-body energy of the human creature. Thus, the inadequate state of Zen-Ken-Ichi should be more completely expressed as Zen-Ken-Kenkon-Ichi, or, “Mind-Body-Universe are one.” Zen-Ken-Kenkon-Ichi is, therefore, a restatement of the three battles of Sanchin advocated by my dynamic ideology of Jiriki Kata-Do.
I'm delighted to have you on the blog again for some scones and morning tea - milk or lemon? - and the scones are, of course, freshly baked - there's some freshly potted strawberry jam too. Congratulations on the publication of your first novel, 'You'. It's a riveting read!
Clove.co.uk now offers the ultra-high-megapixel cameraphone but the pricetag is a bit harder to swallow than the one we saw from Nokia Italy. With the VAT included, the UK price amounts to ?538.80, which is roughly ?655, while Nokia Italy’s asking price is ?599.
My dad used to say everything was an "adventure." He'd be going to the grocery store, for example, and he'd ask us, "Want to go on an adventure?" We pile into the car, excited to try some cheese samples and listen to the radio while driving. That one word made everything feel thrilling.
Because I had such a full weekend, I have to do some errand-type things today, like grocery shopping. Brian and I are about out of food! I am also volunteering everyday this week except for Friday at the Indianapolis Symphony Orchestra to help them prepare for the Maestro Open event this coming Monday.
Having worked for many years, in 2010 I decided to semi-retire and try my hand at designing needlework as more than just a hobby.
The holiday has changed in many ways over the years. In 1971 Congress changed the date to the last Monday in May to ensure a three day weekend. As such, Memorial Day is now celebrated as much for the unofficial beginning of summer as it is for a day of remembrance.
The video for “Black Girls” is just what many man crave: some good ol’ fashioned girl-on-girl action, which casts the white woman in the place of Chester French (who are absent from the video) and reduces the black woman to basically a sex toy.
I spent that night in the hospital, watching tears dropped down from her eyes. Hearing that her dad broke down too, after hearing the news broke my heart. But what touched me the most was her mum's undying faith and relentness not to give in to the disease. She had faith and eyes fixed upon the Lord. She had initial fears but her ultimate fear was in the Lord, for He is the one who is all knowing.
- 2 cups plus 2 TBS of flour unbleached, unbromated flour (King Arthur's is great or whatever you have)
Social 4.6 Average
I started thinking about “A strange girl who abruptly starts talking about strange things and the reactions that occur afterwards…” Then once the character was created, the story came along afterwards.
But I would not trade my life for yours.
He added, as the Times noted, “And I have to tell you that for most people who need affordable housing, that’s just not an argument that washes." The developer has cited the affordable housing to justify the scale of the project, but, given that the scale is not regulated by zoning, that makes the project size a privately-negotiated zoning bonus, rather than an inclusionary zoning package as negotiated by City Council for the Greenpoint and Williamsburg waterfront.
Challenge 17: August 12
love expressed on the cross
As a full-time father, I have the rare opportunity to be immersed in all of this and to be on hand for almost everything that happens to them. While this positionality comes with its ups and downs, the cumulative effect of my experiences with them has been one of great joy. By sending Polly and Pip to preschool I would be giving up some of this, and that is not an idea I relish. More importantly, sending them to preschool effectively outsources all the fun stuff about being a parent while requiring me to spend much of my time playing the less enjoyable roles of nag and chaperone. If the roles were reversed and I got to play with my kids, read books to them, or do art projects with them while someone else cooked, cleaned, and made sure they got out of the door on time, then I would sign up for that immediately. But that’s not how preschool works and so for me, sending my kids to one doesn’t make sense.
“NET will refund you a pro rata for the time you have been without connection since the moment you called us.”
We were very confused project girls. We loved "West Side Story," and we identified with the Jets. But every girl in this picture has Puerto Rican or Mexican or Cuban heritage! Our mothers all spoke Spanish at home. Huh? What can I say, I think it was the song that did it, you know "When you're a Jet you're a Jet all the way from your first cigarette to your last dyin' day." As I got older, I saw "West Side Story" with fresh eyes and realized that more than anything else I wanted to be Anita, dancing like crazy on a tenement rooftop. Or at least Rita Moreno playing Anita.
If working the phone with a tactile keyboard isn’t really your thing, the Extravert also has a 400×240-pixel-resolution, 2.8-inch WQVGA touch-screen display.
I thought a good night's sleep would help with my mood--and indeed I went to bed at 8:30 and slept like a log (with a little help from my good friend Klonopin) until the alarm went off at 5:45 a.m. But, for whatever reason, I was still keyed up and snippy with everyone this morning. So, clearly, it's a me-thing, not a kids-thing, and I've just got to figure out why my emotional state is off-kilter. Work was fine--indeed, work was a relief--and by the end of the day I was in a much better mood and was able to deal rationally with Her Majesty when she, again, refused to brush her teeth. This time we used the naughty seat, which worked, eventually.
I am playing catch up with visiting all of you ........
Risky. But it paid off. She took a recognizably cheesy “inspirational” ballad…. and she Skylarized it into a really cool performance. I loved this…. one of the best of the night. Once again my little red haired, gun toting, 4-wheeling, country girl has won me over. I LOVE her voice…. twang and all. I love her energy. I love the contained frenzy she works into. A ppp (pitch perfect performance).
1) When I was a kid, I thought I could communicate with the people on TV by stuffing my crayon drawings into the VCR.
So, about 4 hours (and plane and a shuttle ride) later I arrived on the William Carey International University campus in Pasadena California. On the shuttle I met two girls that were headed to training as well, Elizabeth and Spencer, and was a little less nervous because I suddenly knew I wasn’t in this alone. Almost instantly upon arriving on campus, God melted my heart a little and opened my mouth and eyes to new experiences before me. Anyone who knows me at all, knows that I am by no means a social butterfly. I tend to avoid large groups (sometimes to the extreme), and don’t really speak unless it is initiated by someone else. However, this journey began with that dropping. It didn’t take me any more than 30 minutes to be headed down the street with 5 other trainees headed out to get lunch! It was so amazing and weird to me that I began actually talking to people. I was interacting and not shutting people out! That night, we were formally introduced to our groups, and there was an instant connection. I’m not going to jump in and say after a week I know that I’m going to be ‘bff’’s with my group members, but God really knew what He was doing! In the Cambodia group, there are 8 people: 7 girls and 1 guy. I can’t explain it, but it didn’t even take an hour to see that God put this team together in His divine power for a divine purpose!
Because it is What’s On Your Workdesk Wednesday I’ll show you a picture of my clay drying rack I made from old wire storage cubes. Do you remember those? They used to always go on sale for $10 a set at Ames about 10 years ago and I probably bought 5 sets ha ha! I like how you can re-configure them in minutes and then take them apart and store them in a flat stack. I explain how to make it at the end of the video but in case you don’t make it that far I’ll recap. Assemble a 5 sided cube with the metal sections and corner connectors. Use small binder clips or zip ties to place as many shelves as you need inside. I used binder clips (you can get packs of 12 clips at the dollar sore) so that I can quickly take it apart. The clay is light so the clips are fine. If you want to use this for storing paper you can, just use zip ties instead to make it strong enough. I lined the shelves with window screening (you could also use sheets of plastic canvas) so the clay does not fall through but also so that air can circulate from all sides preventing warping and hastening drying time.
Unschooling as a Springboard to Spirit & Joy
Authorship, Photography and Copyright Notice : Satya Sarada Kanduls
Does Collins suppose that the family event in the Steeple estate had displays of masked men?
When looking at all of these sentiment and internal indicators together it is hard to see a big decline developing here (like we saw in 2010 and 2011). It is possible that the market may be seeing a bottom here (very short term) and then may have one more push higher before putting in a top. Or, we could be setting up for a consolidation period that could last 2-3 months. In other words, we may not see a breakout above the recent high in the S&P 500 (1422) until somewhere in the June-August timeframe. This latter conclusion would fit in with my cycle analysis of July 2012 being a key turning point for the market as well as the significant market turns in March/April that I referenced earlier.
Months went by and then I went to India to pick up things for my cousin's wedding. I also found my own desi wedding dress which is perfect, it's as if someone knew I was going to this shop and made a dress that would be perfect for me.
7. You can tell me anything - I keep secrets like the gift that they are.
Some people valued their principles to the point of wanting to die for them. She was sure that she was not one of these people. It all just thoughts, ideas, values. Did they mean something beyond what people wanted them to mean? She couldn’t articulate any reason to think so. All she had to prod her was a nagging feeling. It seemed so foolish to surrender to a nagging feeling.
who docent watch YouTube please xbox give us the ability to post our gameplay videos on YouTube right from the xbox.
IDINTHAKARAI -People’s Movement Against Nuclear Energy (PMANE) today launched three campaigns against the Koodankulam Nuclear power Plant that is being set up amid strong opposition of residents of the region and to uphold the citizens’ dignity that is being dishonored by governments.
Sorry ma'am, if you hadn't had sex you wouldn't have gotten pregnant, it's not the HMO's fault for not supporting your promiscuity while not married.
If the culture isn’t what you want, no problem. Changing the culture of a company, department, or even a team isn’t easy, but it is possible. It takes time, patience and persistence. There are three broad steps to reshaping the culture.
Like many people I was extremely impressed by the performances of youngsters Evan Jager and German Fernandez at the USATF Outdoor Nationals in the 5000. 20 year old Evan, in his second serious attempt at the distance, ran 13:22.18 for 3rd. 18 year old German (also his second serious 5000) ran 13:25.46 for fifth. German's mark took down the 2 month old National Junior mark of 13.29.98 (Chris Derrick, Stanford).
Her death comes just one month after her brother Corin Redgrave died, and one year after her niece Natasha Richardson, daughter to her sister Vanessa Redgrave, died after a skiing accident in Canada.
I did my best to let the man speak, knowing that I could not possibly keep track of everything he was saying in real time. I look forward to reading the transcript and absorbing all this new information.
We started our walk in the chilly morning air under an indigo sky. The sun was only just stretching and casting a pink-purple hue over the golden landscape as we walked. Colours are startling in the bush – vibrant, rugged and mesmerizing. The sun, a fiery red orb, finally rose behind the bare outstretched arms of the Jackalberry and Marula trees, warning of the heat to still come.
Monsieur DuPree wagged his tail really hard and strutted up and down the kitchen floor. "Woof, woof, woof, woof." For a moment, the familiar musky scent of the old man mingling with the odor of greasy food gave the dog the feeling of well being. But then, a sense of dread took hold again. His tail hung between his legs and he stood very still.
Lessons Learned from this race:
The frame I used on the front is 5.889 x 3.889
Merciful: will be shown mercy to
July 15 - Googie Withers, actress ("Dead of Night"), 94
I got a comment from Lori about how fast I'm accepting all this. Ironic, as I had been thinking the same thing. However, I have to realize that it wasn't in March, when M told me that she thought that she was confused that I knew this. I can look back and tell you that M was never your typical child. M was totally different. Sports was huge in M's life. M was also on the BOYS lacrosse team from 4th-the beginning season of 7th grade because they didn't have a girl's team until 8th grade. She did 8th, but hated it. She didn't like the girls' dynamics in both the sport or the attitude. Looking back, I can see the depression started when she quit the boys lacrosse. M was treated so poorly by the team, that she actually felt sexually harassed. When I confronted the coaches, they told her to go to the girls team. Back then I had a hard time dealing with anything that would be involving the law and ethics, so M just transferred to the girls' team, and enjoyed the first year. After 2nd year, M lost all interest in sports.
Vigilance
For now, it’s time to study a bit for my last quiz in my college career, and organize and pack some more. I’m going home next week for a couple of nights, and I want to bring a lot of stuff with me. My bedroom will be the easiest part, what I’m NOT looking forward to is going through the kitchen and figuring out what belongs to me…
From its very inception Bush Sr., the corporate government, major bank houses, and the Carlyle group have opposed NESARA. To maintain secrecy, the case details and the docket number were sealed and revised within the official congressional registry, to reflect a commemorative coin and then again it was revised even more recently. This is why there are no public Congressional Records and why a search for this law will not yield the correct details until after the reformations are made public.
I want to come to Japan and look at the cherry blossoms while holding hands! Of course I’d bring a bento (lunchbox) that I made for him~
Key Players: De’Mon Brooks (16 ppg, 6.3 rpg), Jake Cohen (14 ppg, 6 rpg), JP Kuhlman (11.1 ppg), Nik Cochran (11 ppg), Chris Czerapowicz (10.2 ppg)
Joey's worked with some tough characters, but after working with Gina a few day, he longs for those other hard asses. Especially, after she gets her two best friends involved, and they plan a scheme behind his back. He's on to her, but makes a decision when he senses she's blocked out something significant that could shed light on the confusing rhymes. In spite of it all, he risks winning over the woman he's falling hard for and breaking the wafer-thin trust she has in him for his only chance to figure out who the man is and stop him from ruining his life.
Today is: Food fun
We don't have TV either.. Yes, I'm going crazy!
2) Sister depressed
Kate Elliot has a terrible secret. Something so horrible that she can’t even bear to speak it out loud. And now Kate’s mother, who can barely look at her has decided that they need some space. Kate isn’t happy at home, has been acting out and the best thing might be for Kate to become a boarder at the school where she is usually a day girl.
Now I do realize that I am taking about cats & kittens, and to some they are a dime a dozen and I do understand that the pet population is high and we should be spaying and neutering our animals. Fifi will be spayed as soon as her kittens are weaned by the way. But don't think i'm crazy becuase there is a moral and lesson to my story.
here in the going going gone.
France has upheld an earlier conviction against Soros, for felony insider trading. Soros was fined 2.9 million dollars. Recently, his native Hungary fined Soros 2.2 million dollars for “illegal market manipulation.” Elizabeth Crum writes that the Hungarian economy has been in a state of transition as the country seeks to become more financially stable and westernized. Soros deliberately driving down the share price of its largest bank put Hungary’s economy into a wicked tailspin, one from which it is still trying to recover.
Preheat oven to 375 degrees.
This is grocery day. Plan your meals for a week and write down the supplies you will need. Check to ensure that you have an adequate stock of light bulbs, cleaning supplies, toiletries, and the like.
“The first thing he told the audience was, ‘I hope you’re all using birth control,’” she told CitizenLink. “he said there are people using the Bible as an excuse for gay bullying, because it says in Leviticus and Romans that being gay is wrong. Right after that, he said we can ignore all the (expletive deleted) in the Bible.”
Loafers: Thrifted ($3)
I will be the first person to welcome her.
To avoid pickers, particularly flathead, it pays to lift the rig a foot or two off the bottom. The movement of the boat will impart enough action on the flashers to make them attractive to fish although they can be lightly jigged to increase effect. Depending on the waterway you are fishing will dictate the amount of lead needed to send the paternoster rig to the bottom. Port Phillip Bay will require a lot less lead to reach bottom as opposed to a highly tidal waterway such as Western Port. If drifting is more your forte, flasher rigs can be used in the exact same manner as you would whilst anchored. This can be particularly deadly whilst combined with targeting snapper on soft plastics.
So how do we do become memorable? Think about the most memorable and successful businesses in this world. They all have a hook related to what they do, right? When you think about a junk removal company, you aren’t thinking about the little known truck down the street. You are thinking about ‘Got Junk?’. When you think about researching something online, immediately you think ‘Let’s Google it.’ This is all due to great branding on the business owner‘s part.
Now you may be thinking, “That’s great and all, but my enterprise sells to businesses (or sells services, or is in a reg­ulat­ed industry, or . . . ), and I can’t see how funny YouTube videos will help me sell my product.”
This morning my PURPOSE DRIVEN LIFE devotional said that people who look into their own future and envision their lives "down the road" actually have more success than people who just plod along day by day.
My first thoughts:
that is what I call myself.
the last hundred feet to the top was a narrow, rocky ledge of terror. mix that with my arthritis symptoms (inability to grip things well), my meniere's disease (dizziness), my klutziness, and my lack of trust in myself and you get a recipe for potential disaster. so i opted out. mark took my camera and went himself. see, there's me waiting for mark in the bottom of the frame:
I hear that a lot. That this place or that place is the right or wrong place for something or other. But is that so? And why? In my opinion there is only one place (here) and only one time (now). That’s all there is and all we have in this one life so why don’t we use it instead of talking about when the right/wrong place or the right/wrong time will be for things? What, then, would be the right place and the right time for something? Who decides where and when that is? Is it up to each person to decide or did we all decide this together? Is it always the same? Or did we just at some place in time construct this idea as a way to deal with the here and now so that each thing can be kept in place in order to make sense and avoid confusion.
(... which you all know is a lie... I'll be talking about it some more some day... you know I will)
T, still shaken from the whole incident, said she had half-woken up to M wandering around the room in the dark. He wandered into the closet and then started banging around and shouting "ARE YOU SERIOUS? ARE YOU SERIOUS, T?!?!?" etc., and so T not being properly awake, she got frightened and started screaming, and then M started screaming louder.
And now that we have resolved to finish it, I know that you will play your part with calmness and courage.
The mystical journey may begin with making a relationship with one’s inner light, but the mystic is drawn on a deeper journey toward love’s greatest secret: that within the heart we are one with the divine. The fire of mystical love is a burning which destroys all sense of a separate self, until nothing is left but love Itself. While the spiritual seeker is drawn to the light of this fire, the mystic is the moth consumed by it’s flames. Rumi, love’s greatest mystical poet, summed up his whole life in two lines:
5.) Picturesque Tramline
- it seems he's drowned;
But days like that are what I live for, the pure, simplistic bliss that is life.
I am showing you in this picture how the panels look in the pleater.
So - why is dialogue from Star Trek spliced with music by Tangerine Dream special? I suppose the main reason is that I never thought I’d hear it again...
(Maybe next time, when you're older.)
Gray vest and yellow tee, Charlotte Russe. Black turtleneck, Mossimo. Gray slacks, The Limited. Yellow pumps, Victoria Spenser. Black patent headband, Claire’s. Circular brooch, thrifted.
Well I never!!
When I had the regular job I resented every second I wasn’t writing.
I've never seen anything like it. I had Barbie dolls as a girl and my dollhouses were Barbie products. My girl was never much of a 'doll girl', so no dollhouses for her. This is a 'real' dollhouse. The kind that you use with those tiny Fisher Price type family dolls.
kim-a-lish
A year ago, actually 14 months ago, I needed to prove to ALL that this really is the case.
I cried when I learned you were a boy.
There has been a lot of talk in recent years about gay marriage, or rather, about redefining marriage so that it isn’t necessarily a heterosexual union. But another, less frequently discussed, issue walks hand and hand with it, the redefinition of parenthood. I mention this because of an AP story this morning which announces that Melissa Etheridge, and her lesbian lover, Tammy Lynn Michaels, have become the parents of twins.
Empires, as last week’s post noted, have been around for a long time. The evidence of history suggests that they show up fairly promptly once agriculture becomes stable and sophisticated enough to support urban centers, and go away only when urban life also breaks down. Anyone interested in tracking the rise and fall of empires thus has anything up to five thousand years of fairly detailed information from the Old World, and well over three thousand years from the New—plenty of data, one would think, for a coherent picture to emerge.
So you put up a music advertising link to a Youtube video, a blog, a picture or something online to help your music marketing. But is it clear and conic for the music industry market of today online and showing a solid level of professional social media promotion to get someone to actually click through?
Where every atom is the atomized fusion of consciousness
Longtime readers may remember the posts on the so-called verdaccio technique from some time ago, and may see a connection here. I have long been thinking of getting back around to that technique, as I had the impression that the basic procedure was sound, but that the materials were bunk. This painting is going back in that direction – at some point I will try an actual pedigree verdaccio underpainting with glazes, and see if I can’t make something good come of it.
First starting with...
Wendy: (Amazed!) Wow! That’s right bud. Um…that’s great.
I don’t know why my phone is taking such fuzzy shots; I tried several different places with different lighting, but this was the best I could get. Sorry about the poor quality. But, as you can see, it’s all one shade, dark, and no empty spaces. I couldn’t be happier. Now, I can plan my next one, squee!!!
Syd's artwork is very strong and the panel pacing just superb. Some of the pages may be inked or assist-inked by George Klein and I'm nearly certain the panels with the rivals beautiful daughter were assisted by Gene Colan, who perhaps even drew the young woman!
Luckily, it was a super easy fix. First I picked up a package of stick on velcro. I think it cost around $4 and one package was just the right amount for my 48" long desk. (Hammer not required. Dinner at Red Robin a nice incentive though.)
Elie Wiesel's great struggle is against indifference. He has said:
silent on how to implement its requirements. For example it does not
ED: New launch time is 0017 UTC, or 5:17 PM Phoenix time, Wednesday.
Mom: Billie, what do you want to be when you grow up honey-bunch? A fireman? An Astronaut? OOooh, maybe a doctor, then you could save lives!
What do you guys think? Admittedly, I'm not much of a comic book guy, but these look pretty good. I guess I imagine Deckard as more of a bureaucrat. He looks a little too pumped up in these images, but I'm being picky. Isn't interesting to see how others imagine PKD's setting - and how that setting may always look like Ridley Scott's Blade Runner?
They can now share hurts and feelings, where this time last year they would have just shut down. Rages are not everyday for 6 hours. Stealing, Lying and inappropriate behavior has decreased. Sure new behaviors pop up, some easier, some that make my head spin
“They were an odd bunch: serious and cerebral by times, chatty and cliquish at others, but I liked them and admired both their integrity and single-minded devotion to Irish unity. I suppose they reminded me of my grandfather. One in particular even looked like him: white haired, squat and muscular with a face set in granite, conviction cased in steel, all his instincts tuned to the force of his own moral compass.”
Speaking of Victor, that man’s incompetence is reaching ridiculous levels of stupidity. Did he really think that publicly taunting Bodaway was going to work in his favour? I knew the second he did that Malcolm was screwed and I was right. On the plus side, at least he’s taking an interest in Martin/Charles’s dodgy dealings but knowing Victor, he’ll probably screw that up as well for good measure.
I never imagined in a million years when I got pregnant with you that I would spend 36 weeks preparing for you and wanting you just to have you taken away from me. I never dreamed that that was possible and here we are 2 days shy of your 6 month angelversary. I know I keep saying this and I sound like a broken record but, where did that time go? I've missed out on so much of your life and it hurts so bad and so deep that I can't breathe sometimes.
“I’m not gonna name any names but there are some designers that have showed at Toronto Fashion Week that have gotten a lot of hype and then fell. And that’s scary to me.”
STS. PHILIP and JAMES, Apostles.
Raimi reaches into his horror routes-especially in the hospital scene where Doc Ock’s arms violently come to life. It is intense and pretty scary.
Somehow, this little MF crawled into the laundry basket that my mom left outside, while she was trying to save the earth and was line-drying the clothes. So this thing somehow got into the laundry basket and when my laundry was put on my bed, it got inside my sheets and burrowed - because apparently that's what moles do, and that's what this thing did inside my shirt. (I just shuddered while I wrote that - I can still feel it crawling on me).
I have lost 20 pounds and 50 inches all over on the weight loss products. I love the protein shakes that I take for breakfast and lunch. The vitamins and other products you take with the protein shakes help your body work as a whole unit. They help your body absorb the proper nutrients and eliminate the fat.
For those who attended the event I strongly encourage you to get a copy when it is released since it seems like a perfect way to relive the memories and see pictures of the other things that Buono did on their visit!
It seems kinda surreal that this is my last weekend with Sam, just the two of us... that after 2.5 years of meetings and visits we are there....
11-year-old Mei (Catherine Chan) is abducted and forced to work for ruthless Chinese gangsters due to her extraordinary memory and skills in Mathematics. When Mei is given a numerical code to a mystery Safe, the Triad, the Russian mafia, and corrupt New York officials all want her – dead or alive.
So if you order ANYTHING from my Etsy store today or tomorrow you can enter in the coupon code: GRNDOPN for FREE shipping. How's that for a grand opener?!
Um...yes we bought the combo. The large combo. The drink needs to be a Coke Zero.
Towards the end of my visits to La Sante, I found a very pleasant route from my lodgings on the Left Bank to the prison which made visits a little easier. It was a beautiful and textured atmosphere that I could sense on my way to sit on this bench. I made sure each time that this walk included a passage through Luxemburg Gardens.
The links between the Order and Britain go through Lazard Freres and the private merchant bankers. Notably the British establishment also founded a University – Oxford University, and especially All Souls College at Oxford. The British element is called ‘The Group’. The Group links to the Jewish equivalent through the Rothschilds in Britain (Lord Rothschild was an original member of Rhodes’ ‘inner circle’). The Order in the US links to the Guggenheim, Schiff and Warburg families… There is an Illuminati connection.
And as for "entertaining", for poor people, "entertaining" usually means having a moving party when families whose jobs were outsourced by your husband then had to leave when they got the foreclosure or eviction notice served to them by a constable.
My darling image has been coloured with prisma pencils and I have inked around the edges in tattered rose. I have also machine stitched all my edges, although some of it leaves a lot to be desired lol!
I can't wait to introduce our new baby to the world!
His blistering goalscoring form has coincided with a horrible goal drought for his compatriot and strike partner, Ba Ba Senegalese Sheep. The Sheep with the fish lips smashed the bar but Cisse’s clinical ability and confidence in front of goal was epitomized by his first finish. However, his second goal was a stuff made in your wildest fantasies.
enough to grow fat in winter.
The how of the redemption, like the nature of God the Holy Trinity, is ultimately a mystery. And yet the Holy Scriptures and the Holy Fathers help us to approach this mystery. They enable us to understand and believe in our redemption by Jesus Christ in such a way that, believing, we can receive the gift of salvation.
By raisin’ taxes on those workers at the bar
Stolik sank to his knees. “You can kill me, but we will crush you anyway. One panzer will crush your miserable hut; you will die screaming.”
In a Sept. 15, 2011 opinion, ... Glen Van Slyke, assistant county attorney, wrote that the medical examiner is not an appointed public “officer,” but rather an “administrative employee” of the Commissioners Court. As such, holding the position does not require taking an oath of office or providing any written statements.
Plant A Tree In America: The Campaign Vs Al-Qaeda Organized By Mike Fuller, Candidate To The Presidential Election 2012, Begins Its Success!
Also accompanying us was Rosario Alessi, President of the FIA Academy, who, along with Jean Todt, is in Madrid to hand the FIA Academy gold medal to His Majesty the King Juan Carlos I of Spain.
Black cohosh does not cause cancer. In dozens of studies from around the world, black cohosh successfully relieved the symptoms associated with low estrogen, including symptoms caused by cancer treatment. Many oncologists have commented that phytoestrogens, such as black cohosh and red clover, may help protect against “counterfeit” inflammatory estrogens (pseudoestrogens or xenoestrogens) from causing receptor cell inflammation. Receptor inflammation is a major cause of breast and other cancers.
Get the tattoos I have planned
instead of sitting around the table, we worked in the garage, on the ground, with scissors, paint and tape
I’m usually almost never wrong. heh…
A couple of Platinum shiny parallels of a two key Dodgers prospects. Kyle Russell is in Double Chattanooga, hitting close to .300 after a brief, uninspired trip to Triple A last year. Lee is in high Class A Rancho Cucamonga at 2-2 after seven games.
She stares at me, then backs away, shaking her head.
I realize that lack of sleep will do this to me, but seriously? I can’t concentrate on anything for more than just a few minutes at a time. I KNOW what needs to be done, I just can’t get myself to do it.
(I am not crazy about the music accompaniment, so feel free to mute. You have my permission!)
In the months since the horrible allegations against Jerry Sandusky were dug up and then blown up, the dynamics of the community surrounding Coach Paterno and Penn State has ebbed and flowed, starting big and strong but shrinking as more details were revealed. And now, with his death, the community can’t help but grow again.
Residents are lied to, reports of the facts are sporadic at best especially by the local rag. Rather than the elected representatives spending their time attempting to discredit the BNP at every given opportunity and for many of them using their position to recruiting for the various organisations that they represent lets see them work for us. They have no distraction this time round or excuses that they need to defend the area from the BNP, they now have to show substance.
‘White bonfires’
How To Submit
Cookie’s Fortune
Program 1--11:00am VITAPHONE VAUDEVILLE (1926-30)
Who inspired you to write this book?
“She died six months ago,” he finally said. “She’s only alive in people’s hearts.”
I’ll commit to a deep level of oversharing with all of you and tell you that I’ve been seeing a psychiatrist lately, for a variety of reasons. I’ve also been going to CVS a lot, to pick up prescriptions. With the latest batch rattling around in my purse, I wrote this haiku:
Have had sad news this week, a friend's ex husband committed suicide on Monday. He left behind a near 4 year old and a bitter divorce battle. RIP CB!!
Met a porcupine once--but not as closely as the dog who came down the trail and thought that was One Strange Thing that ought to be barked at and closely inspected. Helped the owner pull quills out of the poor dog's nose; I have five of them in a dish on my mantelpiece in Flagstaff.
Some other neat applications of Google Earth in Kindergarten might be:
Basic Principles
$500k-$1 million + a year, increase to 10%/10% (20% total)
To everyone who has put up with my random thoughts this year, inspired me, made me laugh, made me cry - a massive thank you, and I hope next year will be everything it should be, and more.*
Furthermore, the author, Frank Nappi, was very nice. When I received my copy of his book from Goodreads, there was a little note inside thanking me for my interest. He also contacted me on Goodreads, and has been completely considerate and appreciative. I enjoyed his book all the more because of my good impression of the author.
The Little Prince by Antoine De Saint Exupery: This is such a darling little tale, with little nuggets to imagine to. There are bits where I wanted to cry at its adorable profundity! There's nothing like a great children's tale to get a smile on your face.
But I will find time to blog when I’m on holiday. We go sailing you see, so we don’t have internet whilst we’re out at sea. When we get to a port we do, because they’re all outside restaurants, we literally park the boat about 5 feet away from where people are eating their meal. LOL.
My vanilla beans, which I bought in France, are waiting for my return in Ohio at my daughter's house. Therefore, I was not going to buy more vanilla beans. I used a couple of drops of good vanilla instead.
Billy Cobham: drums
2/3 cup grated Parmesan cheese
Organisers: Matthew Beaumont, Alan Bradshaw, Warren Carter, Gail Day, Steve Edwards, Larne Abse Gogarty, Owen Hatherley, Esther Leslie, David Mabb, Antigoni Memou, Nina Power, Dominic Rhatz, Pete Smith & Alberto Toscano.
Matthew 7:16 tells us that we will be able to recognize true Christians by their fruit. Fruit can only be produced if we have a changed life because we have Christ living in us.
That we and Earth are not connected.
I can't wait to see what she will do with all those things.
We'll be back on Jan. 11th to announce all the winners!!!
To sum it all up, I’d say life has been pretty kind to me. I do still think about someone I love dearly but I guess life is going on hey? Just shows how we can never really be frozen in our emotions…
The film enters neither of their lives. It's a film about a nation's psyche, not its individuals. Where you would love a vigorous portrayal of two larger-than-life personalities, the film tiptoes through polite scenes where everyone speaks and acts with political correctness.
When we got to the football ground we had time for a reasonably priced snack in the stadium and settled down to enjoy the football. I was sitting next to a Hearts supporter called Charles and he and I became firm friends. He didn’t smell at all and we shared our fruit pastilles – we shook hands and we both said: ‘Good luck, and may the best team win!’
Judge Reinhardt's wife is the executive director of the Southern Chapter of the ACLU, which has not been involved in the Prop 8 case whatsoever. However because the national organization of the ACLU has been involved, and Mrs. Reinhardt made a personal contribution to the "No On 8″ campaign, . . .
Canola or Olive Oil, 3 tablespoons
(Note: i don't spray for bugs. Occasionally i use Neem for squash borers and DE for slugs etc. These guys make me WANT to resort to spray - but it really doesn't work that great anyway. And who wants to have to WASH their tomatoes before you eat them? not me.)
cool thing is that it will make me use things i wouldn't usually think of.
Some people call this the “Problem-Reaction-Solution” method. It works like this:
her eyes set lightning to my nerves.
“I’m so sorry to disappoint you,” I say pathetically.
Further some more spam each day, but I think I can handle that but maybe won’t check the spam folder every day on both new blogs. Someone has again feed problems and asked if I had a Twitter or facebook account, but I think it was spam either. And no, I don’t have any of those.
I love the mollejas in Argentina, something very hard to get here.
The team started the concentración on Saturday afternoon, and as you can see, the Portuguese speakers were in a good mood, while Gonzalo Higuaín and Raúl Albiol were once again stuck at the hip.
The study was carried out by Professor David Jesson for the Schools Network. He is an associate director of the organisation, which represents 5,000 schools and academies, including about 100 of England’s 164 grammar schools.
“Maybe the first time you saw her you were ten. She was standing in the sun scratching her legs. Or tracing letters in the dirt with a stick. Her hair was being pulled. Or she was pulling someone’s hair. And a part of you was drawn to her, and a part of you resisted–wanting to ride off on your bicycle, kick a stone, remain uncomplicated. In the same breath you felt the strength of a man, and a self-pity that made you feel small and hurt. Part of you thought: Please don’t look at me. If you don’t, I can still turn away. And part of you thought: Look at me.”
I was a kid with longing, and there, on one of those late nights, on the French-language channel no less, (because it hardly mattered), was a film destined to be one of my very favourites; the most famous silent film in the world, by far; the most thoroughly restored, the most lovingly stolen from, the most often screened, too, I bet—and what I saw has never left me. But then, in another sense, it has. That film, that night, was not the Metropolis I saw this week.
I learned the hard way that when he goes to war—I face my own war at home. His war is physical, mine is emotional. Unlike my son, trained and confident, I was unaware and unprepared for the emotional battle that takes place in your heart and mind when your child goes to a war zone.
New York City is a big broad to handle. She’ll smack you around and scream in your face, but whisper that she loves you, until eventually, you love her back. Don’t ask me how it works, it just does.
Writers: The Duffer Brothers
140g/5oz plain or dark chocolate (I used dark for even more of a chocolatey hit)
Now that that's out of the way, this is an Abeil... vassal. A vassal is probably most accurate.
Only 65 days to go! Whoooooooop!!!!!
ITALIAN BREAD WITH OLIVES
She was such fun to ink up with my Copics. I had this great paper from Recollections that seemed to be designed for this stamp. I didn't have to do much more than just add a tied ribbon, a demensional chipboard piece stamped with a cute sentiment and some metal butterflies.
In honor of the 2nd blogoversary, I’m going to share with you one of my favorite posts that I’ve ever written. Most of you were not around for this one as it was in my early days, but I promise, you don’t want to miss out. I had just completed my first sprint triathlon, and to say it was an experience is quite an understatement. You can check out the entire recap here….TRUST ME….you can’t miss this one!
Usage – She constantly misplaced important documents because of her haphazard
So today is the end of April and a beautiful day at that. The sun is shining and the air is pleasantly warm outside. I don’t even see the trees moving from where I can look out to the east. What a great day. Also there is no snow to melt as was predicted all weekend. I enjoy it when those types of forecasts are a bit off.
If we love our husband/father and because we love them we are told to be faithful to them and listen to them and we do it cos we accept that “hukum” (rule) … which comes from Allah s.w.t then why is it the same “hukum’ which comes from the same source has become difficult and debatable?
Now, this is a little tricky because my characters average at around 11 years old, and there aren't a lot of 11-year-old actors to choose from. With that in mind, I've decided to eschew the laws of time and cast any actor from any era. Why? Because I have a 200-year-old ghost roaming around my book, that's why!
1- Lompoc Brewing 8 Malty Nights
Mallin, meanwhile, urged the court not to intervene, saying he believes that it lacks jurisdiction to stop Salvant’s order.
Who said control freak? I heard that....
Turned cold by your sadness
“Can’t maneuver a stitch,” she said breezily. “I took shop instead of home economics, although they do it different these days. That’s why you have to help.”
Pink Flamingos
I was asked by Diana to tell you all about my inspirations for Rollicking Tales: The Farmer’s Almanac. Well, I suppose this can be broken down into two parts. Firstly why was I inspired to edit an anthology of agriculture based tales, after all it doesn’t immediately grab one as a thrilling subject.
It’s surprising how different my routine has gotten. I didn’t know what day of the week it was today. It only took a week for me to lose track of that kind of time. On the other hand, I can tell the time by the position of the sun now (within an hour).
Ability to apply common sense understanding to carry out instructions expressed in written, oral, or diagram form. Ability to deal with problems involving several concrete variables in standardized situations.
i picked up a few. one was the Tilda Swirl. i think i am a sucker for anything that is a fancy circle! i love using them on their own, under a flower, under a rosette, sliced in half, on the edge of a card or project, etc, etc. sadly i don't think the Perched Reed Bird is available anymore. i'm glad i snagged it when i did. not that i use it a ton. but it is so cute!!
One of the many things I love about this book (indulge me here) is the wide range of contributing chefs. We've got recipes from the elite swat team chefs (Adria, Alain Ducasse, Thomas Keller, Eric Ripert, Charlie Trotter, Jean-Georges Vongerichten, Daniel Boulud, David Bouley, Nobu Matsuhisa, Pierre Herme, etc.) and the rockstar celebrity TV chefs (Jamie Oliver, Nigella Lawson, Rachael Ray, Bobby Flay, Emeril, Paula Deen, Guy Fieri, Mario Batali, Tom Colicchio, Morimoto, etc.) and the hard-working restaurant chefs whose places we love year after year and some of the best pastry chefs ever and even a few amazing young talents you've probably never heard of but soon will.
OOOOOO isn’t this so hard sometimes.
151. Getting outside
Marcus: happy.
Now, back to my dad - I suppose his best professional era was the forties through to the sixties. Whenever an artiste came over from the USA to delight the British audiences, if they didn't bring their own pianist with them it was usually (well, often) my dad that would be asked to accompany them. He worked with some good people - Bob Hope and Danny Kaye - to name two. Some of his friends and contemporaries went on to become very famous and my mum always felt slightly irked that my dad was happier to remain in the background.
Hopefully, I am not your first stop on the crop today and you have
a wealth of ideas will sprout from the earth,
Tate: "Oh....but can I get another Mommy?"
I stoop in verdant garb
We also sampled some Dino Bubbles. After all the roaring was complete, my girls went to bed, clean, soothed and ready for some dino dreams….A big thank you to Smith and Vandiver for supplying the samples!
things to hang hats on, some Halloween
If you missed the first installment, which provided some background information regarding Margery Clute's poetry, you can read it here.
because the crop must come in.
However, I am sure one Scripture stood out in her mind, “In those days…men…shall take hold, and will seize the skirt of a man, a Jew, saying, Let us go with you, for we have heard that God is with you.” (Zech. 8:23 Mas Text)
Spinach and Chickpea Burgers
18 sun
Next audiobook:
The Mix’s Erin O’Malley and Michelob Ultra had your 26.2 reasons to celebrate at Roggies. Mix Listeners had chances to win great prizes and of course Michelob Ultra. All day winners were stopping by and enjoying the ice cold motivation of Michelob Ultra, it’s what’s waiting for you at the finish line!
EAST BRUNSWICK, N.J.—Some more film-review catch-up today. First up: Does South Korean director Bong Joon-ho's portrait of an extremely overprotective mother compare at all with my own mother's brand of overprotectiveness?
Finished with the Rayman Origins and the Dead Island. Rayman was worth the hype. Really great, even fun in co-op. Dead Island had elements I liked, but I lost interest well before the finish. 2 more off my list. Might go retro again next.
They had created a character as fundamentally unlikeable as Shu. If I didn’t know that the writers were incompetent fecal stains I would say that this was intentional fanservice.
My own written words shake the leaves from the trees and rush through the empty spaces. My own words charge behind me and around me, they surround me and they submerge me. They warm me and they chill me, my own sentences become the light and they become the dark.
This was proving to be a very long five minutes indeed.
From somewhere I found the urge to discover the Arthurian Legend which I'm only vaguely familiar with. I suspect this urge originated with rave reviews of the old Chaosium RPG, Pendragon and the BBC series, Merlin. When looking up fictional series that might be on audio book, Lawhead's series appeared on a few lists. I was reminded and figured it was time I fnished the book and start the series.
“It” is an invisible word. We use it so frequently and are so used to seeing it, that we barely notice its use when we read it or write it. It takes a good editor to look beyond the expected to what is and find the “it”s that make our writing so hazy. See all my “it”s? Makes me seem like a lazy writer, and normally that would be true, but it was very difficult using so many “it”s in such a short time, but I needed all these “it”s to make a point. “It” has its place, but most often, a more specific word would make the writing come alive.
I looked at a bunch of contact forms and chose this kontactr one because (a) it sends mails directly to my inbox where I can respond to them quickly, which is not a functionality available with using, for instance, google docs to create the form, and (b) it was simple to set up unlike some other sites which required uploading files to the server etc. If you know of a better contact form, I would love to know about it. And I tried to remove the captcha requirement from the present form since that's the source of the problems, but it cannot be removed.
Viewers benefit by Internet TV in two ways. First, viewers now have access to literally thousands of channels worldwide — more than Cable TV and Satellite Dish TV combined. And, all channels are FTA (Free-To-Air) which do not charge any fees whatsoever to watch them. In the past, you could only access FTA channels with your own Satellite Dish setup, which cost thousands of dollars, and required you to know how to set it up and point it at the right satellites. Internet TV is totally different.
Through the Blitz and on through the years of rationing The Sugar Girls kept Britain sweet. The work was back-breakingly hard, but Tate & Lyle was more than just a factory, it was a community, a calling, a place of love and support and an uproarious, tribal part of the East End. From young Ethel to love-worn Lillian, irrepressible Gladys to Miss Smith who tries to keep a workforce of flirtatious young men and women on the straight and narrow, this is an evocative, moving story of hunger, hardship and happiness.
And so today I make you this promise: That I will love you, honor you, and be faithful to you for the rest of my life. I promise you that whatever life has in store for us, we will go through it together, side by side, hand in hand, and heart in heart. I promise to comfort you when you're sad, to hold you when you're afraid, to care for you when you're sick, and to love you every day without fail. I promise to be there through the best of times and the worst. In laughter and in tears, I will walk through this life by your side.
If you have a pulse you interact with other people. How often do you give instructions that begin with ‘don’t'? Heads up all you employers, team leaders, line managers, parents, wives, husbands, significant others etc etc!
Delivery and collection quotations on request.
Reuters reports that House Financial Services Committee Chairman Spencer Bachus has been cleared by the Office of Congressional Ethics of insider trading charges. Because this comes from OCE, and not the House Ethics Committee, it has instant credibility.
And so graced,
My inspiration comes from many, many different places - nature, color, the man-made world, and yes, other artists. Here, I thought I'd share the notes I took during last month's Bead Society meeting.
Once upon a time there was a little girl who grew up and married her prince charming. At their wedding there were 5 bridesmaids dressed in light blue dresses. Several years later the couple was blessed with a daughter who one day wished for a Cinderella dress. So the mother sewed her daughter a Cinderella dress using one of the light blue bridesmaid dresses from her wedding. The daughter loved her Cinderella dress, it was everything she wished for and she lived happily ever after. The end.
The second method involved comparing the African component of the African American genome with the genomes of present-day sub-Saharan African populations—in proportion to their respective contributions to the African American gene pool.
(512) Whiskey Double Pecan Porter
their girls would never dress like that
Where I found it: surprisingly, I first came across this as a song, performing it with the school choir, so that's how I hear it in my head.
Apparently Mr Amis believes that writing for children means having to talk down to his audience. He says: "I say, 'If I had a serious brain injury I might well write a children's book', but otherwise the idea of being conscious of who you're directing the story to is anathema to me, because, in my view, fiction is freedom and any restraints on that are intolerable."
—"Molly Whuppie"—another defier of giants from the British tradition, Molly saves her sisters' lives, then comes back over the terrifying Bridge of One Hair three times to rob a giant and win husbands for herself and the other two girls. Gruesome, since the giant kills his own daughters when he means to kill Molly and her sisters, yet lively and empowering. (from Not One Damsel in Distress: World Folktales for Strong Girls, collected and retold by Jane Yolen, with illustrations by Susan Guevara)
Born in 967, Bolesław is the kind of guy you either rate or hate. Many people think he liked to fight a little too much and this overzealous battle nutter of a king caused nothing but serious fiscal problems for the Polish people. However, I disagree. Bolesław was the sort of king no one messed with, Bolesław wasn't afraid to fight both the Germans and the Russians at the same time. Bolesław even sent crack troops to help his nephew Canute in his conquest of England. Look at the map and appreciate the extent of his kick-ass abilities. As for his poor financial abilities, in 967 what else are you going to spend your money on? if not on battling and general war-mongery?
Trying to get through the menu is endless because the baby keeps screaming. After hearing the directions no less than four times in Spanish (did the babies screams sound like she was requesting Spanish? I guess so.)
like only two soul sisters can...
His film was developed the next day. Leo said he was not surprised to find that nothing out of the ordinary appeared on the film. Each photo showed blurry images of grass, trees, rocks, and sky but no sign of any dress-clad woman appeared on any photo. Leo said that he had heard of previous encounters where a photo of the woman was taken and had not heard of anything actually showing up on the developed picture.
File Transfer Speed
Links on Rail Tickets and Passes
beyond the reach of light
MY COMMITMENT: For the next 365 days, I will share one bite size piece of my inspiration or action that helps keep me nourished, sane or laughing on this sacred, spiritual and darn hard journey.
And through it all … he refused to be bitter. He refused to fall prey to pettiness and malice. He said that hate, in its largest and smallest forms, destroys the hater. He sang at the Hall of Fame just months before he died, sang for the men and woman who had made it in his place. And when I asked him where that strength came from, he talked about his faith. And he talked about baseball.
And if you order and want your choice of cover, could you also let me know in the comments.
And these are included in my Buy One, Get One Half Off and my Buy 2, Get One Free offer!
The Prosecutor had also alleged that Taylor was part of a ‘joint criminal enterprise’ whose purpose was ‘to take any actions necessary to gain and exercise political power and control over the territory of Sierra Leone, in particular the diamond mining areas. The natural resources of Sierra Leone, in particular the diamonds, were to be provided to persons outside Sierra Leone in return for assistance in carrying out the joint
He lacks explosive speed to bend the edge. Very raw and doesn’t have great technique. Crawford needs to read the game better and show better anticipation at the next level.
Bowhunter
vinegar) Picture #3: 1 cup lettuce, 5 cherry tomatoes, handful
When a Tarpon Springs man was pulled over Saturday in New Port Richey, he tried to convince officers that he was one of them, according to police.
It's so valuable to remember that even when you feel like you're treading water, and grade card time is wearing you down, you have done something for these children. And data is the perfect, objective way for you to prove it to yourself.
Wait, wait, wait. Before I plunge into the deep, warm pool that is this character, let me tell you a bit of behind-the-scenes stuff.
of the finished treasure islands…
Then I became pregnant and once monkey had been born I took a few months out but eventually had to leave as his tea, bath and bedtime fell at Brownie time - first time mum, slightly anal about sticking to times to get him into a routine!
reminds me of something a wise wise man once said to me when I was having relationship trouble...."All I can ever figure out to do is to LOVE MORE!" oh yes, indeedy. He's such a leader, that guy.
9. I wanted to tell all the important people, whose lives might be directly affected by this news , in person (or at least personally over the phone) If you are important and you are finding out here now via blog, please forgive me!
I've had help from Newbie, and after spending a whole weekend scanning and posting logs, not to mention sheer frustration waiting for the darn things to finish, my laptop working on "snail about to die" speed.
I was lucky enough to get the International House John Haycraft Classroom Exploration scholarship to be able to go to the conference. Without it, it would have been difficult for me to get there, and I am incredibly grateful for the opportunity I was given. As a condition of the scholarship, I had to do a presentation at the conference, and this was one of the highlights of the week for me. I’m one of those strange people who enjoys public speaking and I was on such a high after the talk that I found it very difficult to get to sleep that night! Mike Hogan took an excellent photo (just one of many he took during the conference!) after it had finished, which sums up a lot of my memories of the week:
Mix equal parts of craft glue and water in a cup. You can adjust the ratio to what seems to work best for you.
"Shecky would crash these shivas and make with the hollow leg. He'd pretend he was on the other side of the family and make off with enough sandwiches to keep himself fat and happy for a week. Sponge cake, the man swam in.
Let’s reflect on these numbers: The top 10% has as much income as everybody else; and one-half of what comes in to the top 10% goes to the top 1%. And the income of the top 1% is heavily concentrated at the very top.
MIX flour, cocoa, & baking powder
Posto Publico - Organic Italian on Elgin Street in Soho.
9pm - Beta Lion
Greene makes even more sense with even a cursory look at the Gallup poll released a week before the June 8 primaries. It found that sixty percent of voters, and nearly 70 percent of self-described independents, said they would rather vote for a candidate who has never before served in Congress. Greene then is the perfect field of dreams for countless numbers of voters. He’s the anti-candidate candidate who got on the ballot with nothing more than moxey, conviction and a vague desire to make change. Then without spending a king’s ransom on the race, without the backing of an armada of telecoms companies, banks, lawyers, unions, tobacco companies and other special interests greasing their campaign wheels, and without cutting endless back room deals can actually win. The first and often the only question anyone who wants to run for office is asked is not what are your ideas and program but how much money can and did you raise? Greene is the candidate who can honestly answer not a penny. The money first and last question drives the polluted stream of American politics.
Grout can be purchased in small bags in any big box home store. I recommend "sanded" grout for the beginner as it is much easier to work with. Follow the manufacturers directions for mixing. Depending on the size of your base you can eyeball the amount of grout you will need. Once mixed the grout should be the consistency of peanut butter.
~ that summer glow ~
74. Toured the Everglades
Obviously the big statement is going to be when the ship is in the water. When it is profitable, when we have all these cool start-ups on board. When people see a start-up that is on Blueseed hopefully become the next Facebook or Google…we’d settle for the next Zynga. As people see it in the water and see that it is a successful project and atmosphere and environment, and a cool place to live and as they come on board and see the kind of people that are there. That is the best way to win over the skeptics.
the Life is Good Conference was as wonderful as ever! The speakers were great, the funshops were great, the weather was awesome, the farmers market rocked our world, and we just had a very enjoyable time. I love meeting new people..... I LOVE watching families in action. One particularly amazed me this year was Pig and Tails (waving!) just enjoyed their interaction. I'm trying to think of a Circle Chat I may be able to host next year...... I love the smaller more intimate settings of them..........and think there should be millions ;)
Sing the song for me
Uh oh. I haven't done this for a while. I've been so good for the last 9 months, but it was inevitable that I'd crack eventually.
Here's the finished sign showing off some hometown love! We were so happy with the mix of rustic, industrial, and modern styles. Perfect for the loft apartment where it's going. I want to try this idea for my own house with other words spelled out, maybe hanging vertically with family photos?
I once had a fling with a hot, foreign language professor. Yum. That was more adventurous, because when he spoke I hadn’t any idea what he was saying. Oh Massimo, you’re just a midnight snack, shhhhhh don’t talk back.
Beta #3 = 482
When the immensely popular comedian Peter Kay wrote in his autobiography that he was brought up as a Roman Catholic and found the notion of some kind of God or higher being ‘comforting’, Dawkins was excoriating. ‘How can you take seriously someone who likes to believe something because he finds it “comforting?”?’ he demanded.
I met a woman named Beloved today. When I told her she had a beautiful name, she said, "dawlin', we are ALL beloved."
Legal Standing
Prepare us for a world of justice
A reason for being pissy:
gave more details than an initial
Just as long
My first encounter with aden + anais products was the organic muslin swaddles I received for O’s baby shower. They were so beautiful and versatile even now that O is 9 mths, I’m still using them.
Chris Webby- Already featured in XXL, Webby has a rapid fire flow and whilst he may be a little repatative in content, he clearly has talent in abundance and even reworks a college classic, Opposite of Adults on his latest tape Websters Laboratory.
Michelle then gave me the nickel tour of the facility, showing me where to find supplies, the kitchen, and laundry room. And there’s a lot of laundry! HSU relies heavily on donations of old or new blankets and towels. Among other uses, towels are essential for drying animals off after bathing. Blankets are often put in with the animals to give them extra warmth and comfort. They also go through a tremendous amount of newspaper, used as kennel liner and thus requiring
The Spey Golf Course was very well known and was a busy place. The gravel pit was also going then. That was between the farm and the seashore. There was also a railway station in Spey Bay. Lots of visitors came to stay at the Spey bay Hotel to play golf and enjoy the seaside. At Christmas it was very busy. Carrie and her husband would go for a meal at the hotel on a Saturday night. There was music, dancing with accordian playing and local fiddle music. Sometimes there was a four bit band (drum, fiddle, accordian, piano?).
I learned that love can be found in food, in song, in touch. That grace is something that can be learned and how to live everyday with grace and dignity. I learned what love is supposed to look like while watching you and Papa over the final years of his life. I watched him after 50 years, shaking at the back of the church because he was nervous that this time you might say no.
I was pulling something out of the oven, last Friday, and inadvertently my hand touched the HOT oven rack. Next thing I knew I had a burn…. That HURT! So I put it under the water to stop the burning process. Did you know otherwise that your skin would continue to burn for few more seconds? I’ve watched that on TV. Then came the pain, and I got to thinking…. what do I have for burns in this house? Nothing!!! Will I have to go out and buy a cream at the store now…? Will it work? (In the picture you can see the area swollen up…)
The story begins a little slow with the introduction of Margaret, a sort of lame biographer who works in her father's bookstore. Margaret's big break comes when she is contacted by Vida Winter, a super-star author who has always been enigmatic about her life. She decides to finally tell the truth about her history, and contracts Margaret to pen the story. They meet and Ms. Winter begins telling her tale.
As I’ve stated before, I never really got into the music of Queen. However, this song has managed to be a part of my childhood. It sounds crazy but I didn’t spend my time watching kid shows when I was around 7, 8, and so on. I was watching shows like Sliders, VR.5, and Highlander. I guess I’ve always been interested in Sci-Fi/action stuff. Today’s song was the theme for the 90′s television show Highlander, starring Adrian Paul. It was also in the 1986 Highlander movie.
Global Magazine, 04/17/2012
Hooptie doodie doodle
Okay, seriously, my apologies for the silence. When I started this blog, I had no followers, I wrote sporadically and didn't have much to say. But I stuck with it and I've come to really enjoy it. It has become a good way to clear my head and focus on actually writing.
The eligibility criteria should not exclude home educated children over 16, who are by definition still in full time education, but the child tax credit office is either unable or unwilling to provide a detailed explanation for the exclusion policy they are evidently now implementing to the detriment of home educating families.
Enjoy your fantastic look!
Dame Good
Campbell's depictions of family life in his novels have often tended towards the sentimental, as in The Influence and the otherwise magnificent Midnight Sun; but his decision to narrate The Grin of the Dark entirely from Lester's increasingly distorted perspective shuts off the exits. There are no saner characters into whose frightened but still normal minds we can flee for a temporary respite; indeed, few of the secondary characters in The Grin of the Dark seem to have much in the way of minds at all. Lester's partner Natalie is sympathetic, but as Lester's state of mind becomes more and more disturbed she simply grows more distant as the novel progresses. Her parents and Lester's are meddling, muddled, vicariously ambitious grotesques who twist every word said to them, while Lester's bumptious editor rewrites his scholarly work-in-progress into overly combative journalese. Even Mark, Natalie's seven-year-old son, becomes ambiguous in his enthusiasm about Tubby Thackeray and his wish to help Lester with his research.
He felt his cell phone in the left front pocket of his jeans as he pulled them off. Two text messages were in his inbox.
#1) Adult education classrooms
It's a cold and wet Winter's day in Helminthdale and I;m actually happy to be getting back to the workplace when I bump into Walter Brimsdyke, The Borough Environmental Health Officer. He has my sympathy already.
The voices came after his first blooding, but he couldn’t tell it to go away. He had wanted it to go away. Every fibre of his body, of his heart, of his mind, of his soul cried out, “Go away!” But the voices stayed.
It reminds me of that show I used to watch as a kid "Where in the world is Carmen Sandiego" (or something like that)
93. Hey, I’m a professional wrestler, can I get ya in a headlock? Don’t worry, I get paid to do this! +
2 brought
A generous benefactor (who shall remain nameless but to whom I am indebted) gifted me a VIP ticket to the Holiday Ale Festival going on now at Pioneer Square in Portland, and so I went yesterday to finally check it out. I am slightly ashamed to say that this is the first time I have been but I have to admit that big beers are not my first love and the idea of spending hours sampling big beer after big beer has always been a bit daunting. Plus it is not the cheapest of fests and spending hours under a tent in the cold winter is unappealing. But with the free ticket, a beautiful evening and a few good friends as companions I could not delay another year.
Nomination 3: Brewdog Hardcore IPA with Dunsyre Blue Cheese at the Brewdog Burns night at the White Horse.
I've tried to bake this cake long time ago, I think close to 3 years ago, for my sis' bday, way before I started this blog
Here is the second poem in the Album. If you find yourself worrying over something, maybe this little poem will provide you with some comfort and a reminder that you are not alone.
“In academia, the subject of the Shroud is seen as toxic,” he reports, “and no one wants to open the can of worms, but try as I might I just couldn’t resist it as an intellectual puzzle.”
The point is this:
A lot of watering, cultivating, and care has to be made for everything to grow properly.
FLYING THE DRAGON is for the kid who has just moved to a new school, who feels out of place in his or her own skin, or who is dealing with a relative who is terminally ill. It’s for a kid who is dealing with culture shock, or the kid who has a non-English speaking classmate and doesn’t know how to reach out. It’s for kids who are curious about other cultures. And it’s for kids who feel caught between two cultures.
In this roller coaster this week, he tried to shoulder a lot of the blame on me. I never was there for him. I never paid attention to him. I never asked how he was doing. So I went through the texts to see if that was true. At what point did I not care how he was doing? Because I’m sure I’m capable of doing that. I DO get self-absorbed. Not that it warranted this kind of treatment, but that’s besides the point. Nope. Not this time. When he got fired from his job (mind you, fired because he was being “accused” of having sexual relations with one of his co-workers…which is ABSOLUTELY TRUE as we all know now), I was there saying dust yourself off, get back on that horse, I have full faith you can do this. When he was down in the dumps over Christmas, I was there saying spend time with your family, I wish I could be there, what can I do to lift your spirits? Every single time, I was there. And that’s just the texts, so I’m pretty sure there are many more phone conversations. So I spent the past two weeks thinking I was the one to blame for this,which is exactly where he wanted me. And why? Because he knew the second I knew the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, I would cut him out.
In sales, in order to reap the benefits of creating trust, these behaviors they must be guided by the intent of creating mutual value.
Having said that, there will always be a nagging voice in my mind asking…if they can sell them, why can’t I? What are they doing and what can they see that I’ve missed? But that’s the businessman in me.
Faith is reason grown courageous. ~Sherwood Eddy
So when Levi articulated yesterday how OOO relates to Invisible Man, I thought that was really amazing. I know that’s implicit there, why not make it explicit! Its important, I think, to do so, for a wide variety of reasons.
Muncy said he saw a protester throw a “black paint bomb” at a photographer, and several on the scene say that another photographer was approached by a protester who pushed her camera into her face as she was lifting it up to take a photo.
Meanwhile, beat eggs, sweetened condensed milk, cream cheese, and vanilla until creamy and smooth.
Jonathan is a counsellor, so the book is filled with real-world examples from his own clients, and their experiences of walking through his 5-step “Be Fearless” plan.
I am entering this card in
Awareness, swift diagnosis and proper ongoing support are key because, as the National Autistic Society points out, more than 40 per cent of children with autism have been bullied at school, more than 50 per cent are not in the kind of school their parents believe would best support them, one in five has been excluded from school and at least one in three adults with autism are experiencing severe mental health problems due to lack of support.
What Ogorek doesn’t tell us is that the vast majority of authors self-publishing through any of ASI’s companies are no Seth Godin’s. Godin, like another very successful self-published author, Joe Konrath, cut their teeth and earned their platform and reputations in the mainstream world of publishing, no matter how they may be disillusioned with it now.
Us: LAUGHING HYSTERICALLY.
Now, a popular website being bought out isn’t a particularly news worthy thing on its own. This buy-out takes on a slightly different edge when you consider this. Jeff Gerstmann worked at Gamespot but ‘left’ after a whole affair involving Gerstmann’s review for Kane And Lynch. Now, with this news today, Gerstmann will be working for Gamespot once again. Funny old world, eh?
My son was obviously not immune to the magic of an excavator on a barge, and day after day I would hear entreaties to go and see it, all pleading eyes and hopeful expression like a puppy at a barbecue.
Mandy recalls that the black clothes, at least, were not peculiar to his new image: “Mike wore black when I first met him in 1957. His theory was that if you dressed in black and white you always matched, so in those days he put together a sort of uniform: black shoes, black socks, white shirts, black Wrangler jeans and a black corduroy jacket. The aim of this dress code was not only to ensure he never had odd socks or mismatched clothes but also to avoid having to waste precious time thinking about what to wear. The same outfit could be dressed up or down, with the aid of a black string tie!”
Yeh!
These are two things that I've found to be a MUST with my three year olds.
And when I achieved this feat
think that ‘they’ are going to grant you some favor(s) – is your ego
This info goes under your name.
the ground war began today
Fill in the blank; "back-yard breeder" (or "BYB"), "puppymill" (a phrase coined by the animal rights terrorists to divide and conquer us...it's working, by the way), or a modification, such as "showmiller".
Unaware of this confession
Duane Ensing - I love getting to know my clients. Asking questions and keeping up with how they direct conversation reveals a lot about them, but I've found that moving the conversation to a dialogue unrelated to the landscape has led to many interesting and unexpected comments that have greatly impacted the design.
I love to make new friends and would love to hear from you or answer any questions. Feel free to email me! My multiple personalities will throw a coin to decide who will answer them.
The appointed date came and every country had contributed to the Bailout Fund. The explosive yield and trajectory had been precisely calculated by people with PhDs in
I had roast pork this time around and Mr had the vegetarian wellington. The pork was quite huge, with all the requisite veggies and extra crackling! The veggie wellington was nicely thought out- with a big mushroom inside, greens and other veggies, with a mustardy mushroom sauce and greens. We shared a sticky toffee pudding (to which the neighbouring table all exclaimed 'wow' when it arrived, I think they ordered one too).
The Mets won the rubber game in Denver yesterday 6-5 over the Rockies in a wild game that saw the Mets lose leads of 4-0 in the eighth and 5-4 in the tenth before finally pulling through in the eleventh inning.
1 tsp Yucatan spice blend (contains paprika, black pepper, garlic, allspice, coriander, vanilla, parsley) – skip this or improvise!
Second up: AB:08 - an 11.8% deconstructed Imperial Stout.
The contentious image of the Legislature could also be a deterrent. Rarely has that image been so fully displayed as it was this year when a Democratic-controlled House and a Republican-led Senate sparred over political redistricting and budget issues.
Repeat these last 7 rounds three more times
Outdoor activity and alcohol? Done! The Tour de Vineyards is a 25-mile bicycle tour through Palisades wine region in Western Colorado, the highlight of a weekend that involves chef demos, wine competitions and plenty of tastings from one of the country’s emerging vintner hubs.
To settle the after-dinner crowd, Liesl began a warm and rippling etude by Moszkowski. Later, like the times she had driven for miles in deep thought and couldn’t remember anything about the route she’d taken, she realized she’d finished the etude without inhabiting it─a transgression for any concert pianist.No more of this! she scolded herself.
Totally functional right? Goodbye rummaging for that favorite piece of jewelry! And it's such an easy DIY idea to use pretty drawer pulls and closet organizers, or, you could totally hit up the talented Venishka by heading over to her Etsy shop to check out more options and snag one of these beauties for yourself!!
What is the appropriate response? Many of you are incredible chefs and cookbook authors. I’m just … me.
I am having flu since early morning and you know how runny nose would cause discomfort to you. A very uncomfortable sickness indeed!! Anyway, I am struggling in the office trying to finish all my work today as I will be on leave starting tomorrow and the whole next week. We are celebrating Eid ul Fitr (similar to Christmas for many of you) here so I will be going back to my hometown tomorrow. I am already so excited for the gathering of family members, the delicious food and yummy cakes, the visits and I am more excited to celebrate for the first time with my other half and his family :)
At a distance the figure waits and watches
Plus, the work itself teaches you how to do the work in a funny kinda of a way. Yes, I've often thought that I'd love to do a fourth one, in fact I have a treatment partially written for a fourth one. If I ever did it, it would be -- the twins now but my age. And how they're kinda settled into a life, and there is a set of female twins with their own twisted story. And one of the primary elements of the fourth one, would be the fact that Belial was never really a character but a caricature. I would play Belial in the fourth one and we would fully develop his character and the interaction between the brothers.
Sorry I haven't had much to "show and tell" the last several posts .... I have been focused in a different direction lately! I needed to try and say something on my other blog because it had been a while, finally got that done today. Whew...that feels better....
“Would you like more? Here let me get you some. Roman… do you know your last name?”
Zach's summer:
So this year we all dressed up as Harry Potter characters! I had a lot of fun making the kids robes in their characters' house colors, shopping for accessories, and going through a few different Goodwill stores for Marc's and my costumes. (total score on my wig btw only $1!!) You can see a bit about the process of making the robes here.
Our national council met last week after receiving a report from the leadership, together with recommendations on the way forward.
All those things say … I am god and He is not.
And so, a rant. If you don't feel inclined to read a rant about the evils of corporations and all such modern inconveniences, feel free to log off now and come back later when there's something more fun going on.
And remember, God wants us all to trust Him with our live. Let’s all think like Alfred E.
Bartending has taken me to a place where I never thought I'd be and I look forward to see where it takes me..."
“Xanadu is a romance, musical, and fantasy movie. In approach, it is not serious. It takes place, at least partly, at a nightclub. Xanadu is set in California. It happens in the 1980s. Visually, it includes animation and live action and involves special effects. The musical score of Xanadu is disco, pop, and rock. It is especially suggested for a girls’ night, a date night, and teens. Note that it includes brief nudity and profanity.”
We eat here at least once a month.
I've tried taking pictures of the new space with my Canon, but they come out boring as hell, sadly.
It's 8.7% ABV and poured gloopily to a bright garnet colour. Peaches in the aroma and a beautiful mouth-watering juicy mandarin and jaffa foretaste. The bitterness kicks in after but it plays things smooth avoiding all the pitfalls of big hop barley wines: there's no harshness, no boozy heat and no cloying syrupyness either. They could certainly offer the folks at Southern Tier a few pointers on balance.
vampire weekend - "cape cod kwassa kwassa"
My husband always asks how my day went. And he really wants to know. He’s nice like that. As we slowly push the girls around in the stroller, he shares what went right during his day at the office, and I share funny things the kids said. On bad days we vent stresses and offer support and advice.
Less than a week later, mind you, the day before Christmas Eve, I began experiencing some light spotting. For fear that that meant an impending miscarriage, I called the doctor. They normally tell you to just lie down, put your feet up, etc. But after speaking with my doctor, the nurse told me to come in for an ultrasound. I told Ruben I thought that was odd, but didn't complain because I knew that meant, hopefully I would sleep better that night. In my heart I knew that the spotting wasn't a big deal, and probably didn't mean anything.
Wednesday: We had a schoolwide Mass
Olive Classics.
WVA SC Chapter Group Show
Happy Crafting...
Thomas was an arch enemy of environmental movement in that he invented Ethyl
Whisk in the eggs and egg whites into the chocolate mixture one at a time until mixture is glossy. Whisk in the sugar. Whisk in the pureed beans and vanilla. Add the dry ingredients, all at once, to the chocolate mixture. Use a spatula and fold to combine. Once fully incorporated, pour the batter into the prepared pan. Bake for 44-48 minutes until a toothpick inserted into the middle is mostly clean. The brownies will continue to cook as they cool in the pan, so you want to take them out when there’s still some batter on the toothpick.
this is a thing of the past, crinkled books in the bath, when we have given up on our books altogether, what will we put on our shelves instead? A friend recently told me 'her dream house would have shelves with a Kindle and perhaps a shell or one perfect candlestick'. I do like this image - I hate clutter. Except books, I don't really mind 'organised' book clutter and I think - I know - I would miss my books as a backdrop.
No honking, no car , truck or bus sounds came through ..
Blessings…
Young Adult Fiction In Stores Next Week
Me: Fuck off Ed Begley Jr.
....To sum up, it is clear that the waters of the eastern Mediterranean are heating up and that Turkey is facing a multi-problem environment in this region. This is quite a change from the days when Ankara was aiming for “zero problems” in its regional ties.
The worst thing about this book is its cover. It's orange. And there's a silhouette of this woman in these short heels - heels so low that you wonder what the point in wearing them is, I mean, if you're going to have uncomfortable feet, why not be as tall as you can be? And she's wearing a businessy skirt and a pony tail. Quite a contradiction.
I spent the past two Fridays working at Panhandle Animal Shelter and want to let all our readers know what a wonderful experience it was. The shelter is extremely clean and well organized. I met some great folks who are dedicated to dogs in need. Pat, in the office, is a very friendly lady who loves dogs as much as I do. Brian Welch, the Kennel Technician, hunts grouse and ducks with his Pointing Lab. We obviously hit it off immediately.
There's the little one who claims he can tie shoes, but really just likes to make knots that are impossible to untie!
Sandipan Deb and Tarun Tejpal were past editors of the magazine.
and the winters warm, say the quilts folded on the bed frames.
# Reveal your innermost secrets sometimes even to a stranger
The guitarist for my band, Kill the Huxter, had just informed me that a family vacation had popped up and the comeback show we'd slated for August 27th (see flyers below) was off. I suppose we could find a replacement guitarist and teach him or her the licks, but I try to recognize and deal with underlying problems and not put an adhesive bandage on the symptom. Since I had been in talking to the venue, I get to inform them of our flakiness and find a replacement band. After that, I'm going to focus solely on the drums for the band and nothing else.
It really looks quite awesome!
We were told that offenders will be employed throughout the facility in areas such as food service, laundry, vocational programs, school, etc. We were told that a large majority of the offenders will be working on the grounds crew shoveling snow and sweeping, etc. All offenders will be paid for their work assignments as is the policy throughout the system.
We went to the gig and she got up to perform. The room was run by an old couple. We were getting paid a couple hundred dollars each and a hotel room to travel to god knows where just outside of Philly. We performed in the private room of a chain restaurant. On this particular night, there was a table – one long table – of a good 30 to 40 black people. There was a second table – where we sat with the old couple/ bookers and my opening act. Aside from that, there was only one other table in the room. A round table to my left. At the table were a white couple. I didn’t think much of them at first. They seemed to be a typical, suburban-ish, tattooed, white couple. The woman was mumbling, but I thought – well, Jesus, she must be drunk and shrugged it off. She’ll stop at one point, I believed. The opening act was performing, the eccentric, old couple were in and out of the room, chatting with people and enjoying the buffet, but the white girl at the table – she was getting louder and louder.
Open to anyone who can legally enter and use an amazon gift code.
this looks a comfy corner for a cup of tea or putting your feet up for forty winks - love the country freshness of the classic large gingham curtains, the piped chair covers and the patterned paper on the dresser back
The teen girls are both charged with endangering an injured victim and with rioting, he said.
The couple that own this shop which, is next to their home, find salvaged items to create new decorative things. The gentleman goes to old factories and odd places like that and digs up all kinds of fun treasures like faucets spigots. And he turns them into hanging racks.
I have always thought I am overweight, and you can read about my particular eating issues in an earlier post. One of my most hated areas however, has always been my stomach, and for a long time I have considered liposuction, but the cost has put me off. I’m not worried about having an invasive treatment, living with BPD you get used to pain and scars!!
THE OLYMPICS IS IN LONDON THIS YEAR
NAB booth #SU1802
UK 97m, Colour
Many people believe Spain is nothing more than a tourist’s oasis. The Balearic Islands, namely Ibiza are legendarly destinations for the rich and famous along with the Costa del Sol or “Sun Coast” where this Iberian Peninsula’s coastline harbors movie stars and golf enthusiasts. The Mediterranean Sea is nothing short of majestic, but tourist destinations only begin to get one’s feet wet. Spain is a country where high tide brings a title wave of culture. ¡Venga!
An antenna like this does a poor job of picking out the desired signal from all of the noise that exists in the environment. With higher sensitivities to undesired frequencies, the likelihood of picking up interference is higher. This decreases the signal to noise ratio, increases the amount of error correction the phone has to do, and ultimately reduces the throughput speed of the phone. Translation – your download speeds get slower.
This excludes vast areas of the air force’s public-information effort. Writing back in I970, Senator J. W. Fulbright had found that the air force public-relations effort in I968 involved I,305 full-time employees, exclusive of additional thousands that “have public functions collateral to other duties.” The air force at that time offered a weekly film-clip service for TV and a taped features program for use three times a week, sent to I,I39 radio stations; it also produced I48 motion pictures, of which 24 were released for public consumption. There is no reason to believe that the air force public-relations effort has diminished since the I960s.
Before Christmas, I bought these curvy white spindle bookends for Kevin's aunt. I loved them and wished I could keep them. While I was at Indigo (three times in one week!), I fell in love with a candle. It was gardenia-scented, and in a pretty mercury glass container. Normally, I dislike strong floral scents, usually going for spice-scented candles.
Joe Clabby plays Mr. Clyde, a wealthy man with a litigious trigger finger. There’s a dry, semi-weaselly quality to Joe’s performance that really sells the central joke as well as the dynamic between he and the Russian roofer. Speaking of Boris, my job as that character was to lay as motionless as possible while conveying mild panic and vulnerability. All in all it went well, except for the fact that I forgot to apply sunscreen. So, I ended up sunburned on one side of my body from laying in that position during the 5 hour shoot.
The truth is there's something very uncompromising about photographs. Historical novelists can easily forget the reality of bad teeth, smallpox scars and unwashed bodies when they consider the work of tasteful portrait painters – but photographs show everything but the smell. I suspect ‘scratch’n’sniff photos of the past would be the death of historical romance.
My rating goes up like 2 stars just because it is quick and easy. Between 3 sets of homework, music lessons, and someone always needing me for something, dinner is hardly ever a slow, take how much time you want occasion. It is usually in, out, throw it in the oven dinner.
This doesn't really seem possible-- he was nineteen when he and I started dating, which is only five years older than our soon-to-be daughter. Crazy! Since our daughter won't be allowed to date until she's at least fifty I can think about it without totally freaking out.
And even if you don't live nearby, if you should happen to visit the area on one of these days, come join us for a fun day of beading and camaraderie. About half the time is devoted to the program, though you're welcome to bring and work on your own project as well. The women are all so talented, fun and welcoming its become one of the highlights of my month. Oh, and lunch is potluck. (And someone, I'm not sure whom, brings the best deviled eggs. Yum!)
Like a burning blaze
I snickered into my hand, careful to avoid eye contact, pretending to have a coughing fit.
But just when Reese thinks the day is saved, Elias double-crosses him. He locks Reese and Leila in a refrigeration van, handcuffs Reese to a pipe out of reach from Leila, then turns on the chill. This van scene might be my favorite scene so far in this entire series! There’s no fighting, but it’s incredibly powerful:
Papa Levi - Speed Rapping
You are going to save a whole lot of time today because in this colunn I am going over all of the "Black" bands showcasing at SXSW this year. When I'm talking "Black", I'm talking about the band's name, not the color of their skin.
Right here is the point where Dianetics has been blackened and Scientology reversed: ”But he can’t go anyplace above that without having his self-determinism restored to him.”
1 decisions
Patrick & Amanda
So I went out to my car and called the number. After being on hold forever and routed through three different people, I finally got a Customer Relations associate. He proceeded to tell me that there was no way they could extend the plan because the company who underwrites the plan for Best Buy would not allow it. So I told him that even if they couldn’t “extend the plan,” they could decide to just bite the bullet and fix or replace the computer for me as a longtime customer. The Customer Relations associate told me that he couldn’t make that decision. That was up to the local store manager to eat the cost. So he told me the names of the managers of the Mansfield store and said “I’m so sorry. If there was something I could do I certainly would.” Yeah sure. He was just in a hurry to pass the buck on to some other poor sap.
when you take me
The nose is rich, fragrant, lifted and vibrant with real richness, herbal, earth and chalk mineral notes together with black cherry, kirsch, leather and a touch of chocolate.
On a more positive note, the chillies and the tomatoes are doing well. Even the sweetcorn has started to make an appearance.
Since I need SOOO many Birthday cards I decided to make this little ice cream cone. I used the Sweet Something's stamps for the sentiment. This is a super easy card and since time has been of the essence in our house it is exactly what I needed.
If you are very easily offended, or get mad at crude humor that you might label as inappropriate, then this might not be for you. It definitely isn’t for the kids. If you like to laugh, and don’t mind the occasional fart joke, this will probably be right up your alley.
So what is a girl to do? This guy’s relationship with my husband is unfortunately important enough to merit his car being in our garage. Regardless, this is a prime opportunity for payback. It could be as garish as a “Pimp my Ride” episode gone very, very wrong. It could be as subtle as just him knowing this little “harmless” rant exists.
What did Younger themselves call this beer? Depends on which side of the border you were. It was marketed as Strong Ale in Scotland and Scotch Ale in England. Now here's another question: what would I call it? I can't see anything wrong with calling it Scotch Ale. Or Strong Ale for that matter. Or Barley Wine. All are equally valid. My personal preference would probably be Strong Ale. Nice and vague.
Welcome to Christian Bookshelf Reviews, Amber! Will you tell us a little about yourself?
Projects with other people take as many times as long as there are participants. And some steps in a project are simple, but others are extremely complicated–one must take the long view.
How would you interpret Maslow’s B-Values in your art?
4.Have a good time-seems like a stupid tip but you will be amazed at the amount of people who go into the night expecting trouble. Go with the flow and let loose, do not forget to be safe, just do not be uptight, otherwise you should have just stayed in at home!
Language : Korean
Blockette never eats gravy. She makes a stinky crinkled up face when I even suggest she try some on her mashed potatoes. For some reason she didn't hesitate to try this gravy. And guess what? She loved it! Maybe this means she will eat some at Thanksgiving? I won't hold my breath!
I can only guess, and I am far from being alone, that there is a lot more to the story, and that Hunt is Dave's human shield. If he goes, the skeletons will come rattling out of the cupboards.
It's a lot more than an arena, actually.
Unfortunately, Senator Santorum, your wife is not here tonight.
So we head into 2010 with history's two fastest hurdlers looking to return to their best form. In an off year with nothing on the line but egos, and a new Diamond League offering plenty of potential showcase opportunities!
In 1974, the character Harry Klein was replaced in Derrick by his younger brother Erwin, played by Fritz Wepper's brother Elmar Wepper. Harry was transferred to the new Krimi series Derrick, starring Horst Tappert. In Derrick (1974-1998), Wepper would play Harry, now promoted to inspector, 281 times. The series was sold to over 100 countries, and is reportedly the most successful German TV series ever. In the cinema, Wepper appeared in the French Sci-Fi film Le Dernier Combat/The Last Battle (1983), the first feature-length film by the then 24-year-old Luc Besson. With his brother Elmar, Fritz Wepper worked together in the TV series Zwei Brüder/Two Brothers (1994-2001). He also had a role at the American made-for-TV remake of Agatha Christie’s mystery Murder on the Orient Express (2001, Carl Schenkel), starring Alfred Molina as Hercule Poirot. Since 2002 Wepper plays the lead in the TV series Um Himmels Willen/For heaven's sake, for which he was awarded the Deutscher Fernsehpreis (German TV Award). He stars in the series as mayor Wolfgang Wöller. In 2004 Harry Klein returned in the comic animation film Derrick – Die Pflicht ruft/Derrick - Duty calls! (2004, Michael Schaack, Michael Ekbladh), and once again Wepper gave the character his voice. It was not a success. Since 1979, Fritz Wepper has been married to Angela von Morgen, Countess von Grotz and former Princess von Hohenzollern. They have one daughter, actress Sophie Wepper, with whom he appears in the TV series Mord in bester Gesellschaft/High Society Murder (2007-). From 2009 on, Wepper lives together with camera woman and director Susanne Kellermann, who is 36 years his junior. In 2011 their daughter Filippa was born.
In Dear Genius: The Letters of Ursula Nordstrom, is the following letter. Nordstrom was the editorial director at Harper from 1940 to 1973, and she was Wilder's editor. The letter writer's name is not provided in Dear Genius. Here is Nordstrom's response (page 53 and 54)
I wanted to get in at least one game of Belfort with the upcoming expansion. I found some complete strangers to play the game (it’s so easy to find people to play games with at the Gathering!). Two had played the game before and one hadn’t, but they were all interested in playing with the expansion. The playtest went smoothly with one player saying that he’d only ever want to play Belfort with the expansion in the future because it brought the complexity up to a level that he enjoyed more. The game ended up in a tie between me and another player, and the tie-breaker is number of resources – and we both had the same amount of resource, so it was a complete tie!!
So there you go! I went a little over on my 10 hours with Greek Mandala, but I just couldn't stop! It's a lot of fun to stitch. Back to Mario now, though - gotta get that guy finished. Definitely ready to have him out of my rotation. Still a ways to go, though.
In a family of strong-willed people, Jake’s may be the strongest. As his parents we realize that at 18 he has absorbed all he is getting from us. One of my favorite quotations comes from Zora Neale Hurston’s Their Eyes Were Watching God, when the main character, after reflecting upon her life, offers her friend this bit of wisdom: “It’s a known fact . . . yuh got to go there to know there. Yo’ papa and yo’ mama and nobody else can’t tell yuh and show yuh. Two things everybody’s got to do fuh theyselves. They got to go tuh God, and they got tuh find out about livin’ fuh theyselves.”
If you look closely, you'll see I've added a few more blogs to my reading list on the right. They're actually ones I've been reading and enjoying for many, many months but for no particular reason they remained hidden on my dashboard reading list. So, of course, I highly recommend you turn your attentions there....such a shame that Going Gently is a sad, sad post today.
I suspect you are not unlike myself. Afterall, I maintain that us bloggers nest best. We show off our latest bit of prettiness for our home, as if it is a main event. We all oooohhhh and ahhhhh over it and are so excited that there are others out there just like us, and that we have this amazing forum to share with people all over the world.
Here's one from today...
Steven Brust
While I will never be able to sufficiently satisfy my curiosity surrounding Kay’s decision, I do know this: regardless of reason, Kay’s phone call changed my life. As a pair, Kay and I were irreparably damaged by girlhood jealousies that turned into teenage retaliations. We were both too volatile as people to remain close. Years could pass before we would contact one another; to characterize our friendship as sporadic would be placing it mildly.
Happy New Year everyone, go get'em.
A fundamental part of being human involves maintaining harmony with nature. Disharmony occurs as a result of being out of touch with nature, including the nature of who it is that we essentially are. Emotional imbalance, illness and various other conditions serve as reflectors (or reminders) that this connection has to some extent been compromised.
here's some pics i've had of my 'life' to share:
In case anyone is wondering how I ended up with ANYTHING, you’re not alone. The day my former husband revealed his crimes to me, March 18, 2009, and told me federal authorities had frozen our bank accounts and our assets, that we were losing everything, I envisioned that, literally, to be the case. In my mind I saw giant government semi trucks, with dark tinted windows, pulling up to my home and removing everything from it, including my clothes, my shoes, furniture, jewelry, my treasures (like a painting my deceased mother painted), etc… In fact, terrible as this may be, one of the things I did that day before I went to bed to not sleep was go to my closet and remove the tags from a pair of jeans I hadn’t worn yet–hoping that if my jeans couldn’t be returned to the store, maybe the government would let me keep them! (I just knew I’d never have money to make a single purchase again in my entire life.)
The time went by so fast;
Of course, Astley’s song is from, like, the eighties, which was a million years ago. GOSH, Mom. Get with the times.
So they are without excuse; for though they knew God, they did not honor him as God or give thanks to him, but they became futile in their thinking, and their senseless minds were darkened. Claiming to be wise, they became fools; and they exchanged the glory of the immortal God for images resembling a mortal human being or birds or four-footed animals or reptiles.
The beauty of incorporating it into theAbysmal is the mathematical weave of time periods, over the course of 4-, 5-, 7-, 13-, 28-, 52-, 91-day periods, as well as from year-to-year. For example, December 21st 2012 will be 4-Ahau (4~XX, sun). The following year, December 21st 2013 will be 5-chicchan (5~V, serpent), in 2014, December 21st falls on 6-Oc (6~X, dog), 2015 is 7-Men (7~XV), then 2016 is messed up by the leap year. So the same day progresses from year to year by increments of 1 and V. This is true for any given day of the year, provided the leap year is dealt with.
Lean Pork, 1kg, cut into strips or blend
I first, was like, "My name is Mom, or Allie, not hey..." and silently I looked at her as if she had two heads. She looks at me like that all the time when I ask her not to leave her pj's on the bathroom floor every morning after bath. It's her turn.
(well they will probably taste the same anyway..)
Russell Crowe/Al Pacino (The Insider)
Hi, Free-Rangers! Leaving behind the topics of politics, feminism, environmentalism and all that, here is a comment from a few posts back:
So here I am with a full framework of thoughts, as an alternative to a scenario of regional war .
What is divinity if it can come
Its 3hree AM in some middling Melbourne wine bar near Southbank. Friends of friends have dispersed long ago, in couples both new and old, in taxis and cars and off into the night. One of them looked incredibly like Nikki Webster, it distracted me for hours. Circumstance has ensured I'm here in Melbourne unaccompanied and my hotel room will only contain a left over slice of pizza, but it's all good for now. I'm left with the stragglers and my deeply unsympathetic friend Louise. Louise is a cold hearted pragmatist locked in a deep competitive race with no-one in particular to acquire more trinkets than anyone else. Across from us, an Italian waitress cleans a glass several times over, hoping we will leave soon so she can close up. The security guard hops awkwardly from foot to foot in desperate boredom, and 2wo of our other friends are awkwardly trying to pash, paired together by default and middle age ennui. I'm struck by how tired Louise looks - I wonder what happens to party girls as they age, when it's awkwardly painful to get in a cab at 8am and keep up with the younger girls. The last time I saw Louise before tonight she was throwing shapes in the middle of a dance floor with 16teen year olds. I do admire her self confidence in many ways. She plainly can't dance, but she doesn't care, while every step or shape I throw is laborious and pained. I inherited my lack of dancing ability from my Dad. I've turned down two or three dances already tonight, due to a lack of confidence. I'm neither drunk nor sober, and simply babbling to kill the silence. The Italian waitress walks past, and over laughs at 1ne of my jokes, perhaps for a tip, perhaps to indicate that she's watching us impatiently. Time is moving slowly - words aren't having any impact...neither are badly spelled text messages it seems...
This might mean we have not had real weather, natural weather, classically seasonal weather for a long time, say the amount of time Big Ag has slurped a lot more water than is available to grow their pesticide generating, bee killing crops. Lately, with the predictability of sprayings followed by weather disturbances, I'm trying to recall how long ago we might have seen natural weather at all. Maybe, if the thirsty personhoods pay full price and power is appropriately convinced of need, pilots are enlisted to work through the night since there are often nights the Milky Way is obscured with crazy zigzags - in which case, first light carries obliterating see nothing - know nothing fogs followed by news coverage of 40 vehicle pileups on major interstates because commuters refuse to take the hint in the mindless rush to beat the clock.
a half years. Me, married. Wow. There are days I can hardly believe it and I feel like singing the Barbara Streisand song, “I Finally Found Someone” … the only difference is I know that a random “finding” is not what happened. It is a gift, given to me by the hand of a loving Father.
Anik sighs to himself as he thinks
4/3
Challenges -
Those people with the big house and new cars and all the new toys?
The message that’s sent you
~ Christina Perri;Drew Lawrence;Barrett Yeretsian
these are some of the rewards of the simple life.
Sometimes when it rains it pours, and this year after waiting years for some middle distance help to come along we got a double dose in 2010 as Leonel Manzano was right there with Andrew Wheating on the improvement meter. Manzano equaled Wheating’s best time of 1:44.56 in Berlin. Which caught me by surprise because I’ve never thought of him as an 800 meter runner – silly. In what I considered his specialty he ran 3:32.37 in Brussels, and 3:50.64, and showed an amazing ability to kick off of strong paces! Imagine that, we develop two middle distance runners that can stay with the pace AND kick in the same season! Manzano was a joy to watch and I eagerly wawait the 2011 season to see what he will do in Daegu – because he’s finished in the top two at nationals two seasons in a row now and I have to believe that he is going to make the team for Worlds.
Colonel Blimp', 'A Matter Of Life and Death' and 'Peeping
Run the engine at optimum conditions, meaning low friction (modest engine speed) and low pumping work (air throttle more open). Try to approach the “pushing-the-pistons” efficiency of 35%. This already is happening in some stationary piston engines – large, slow, piston engines used at pipeline compressor stations, for example. Also, this is an important characteristic of the engines used in the hybrid gasoline-electric vehicles. Let the gasoline engine in the hybrid gasoline-electric power plant only run with good throttle opening and modest RPM.
Okay, now that I’ve gotten that off my chest, time for a question.
I’m a crafter at heart and this year All I Want For Christmas is a snowman (with no snow), so I made my own.
# Acetic acid is an antiseptic and inhibitor of pathogenic bacteria.
I loved the little buttons the moment I saw them with their metal centers that were all covered in patina. Natural beauty right there. I picked them up at The Rusty Chair in Rogers AR and Julie (the owner) said that another lady had been looking through the buttons and was somewhat grossed out by the patina on those beauties, I know, there's no accounting for taste, lol. But at least they were there for me!
9. Chanson d'Amour (2:43)
How demanding is it?
Pass this on to anyone who may need a break from their grown up life...
You can explore all of the outside areas but then also go in and see the different animal houses (like Invertebrates…go visit the Octopus they are fascinating!). The Giant Pandas are obviously one of the highlights, but once you’ve seen them make sure you check out some of the other “off the beaten path” places. One of my favorite areas is called “Amazonia.” It is an animal house that is filled with giant tanks and all kinds of creatures you’d find in the Amazon rainforest. I’ll admit, I joined the other kids in smooshing my face into the glass and watching the fish swish by. You should also check and see if any new babies have been born recently, the zoo is really active in animal preservation and there are often new little animals to admire.
A new year
Promise me that you will give this scent a whirl.
If they simply don’t understand football, then they need to be big enough to hold their hands up and say so, bring sensible people into key roles who do understand the game (such as a chairman) and admit they do not wish to invest much money. You don’t need money to be successful – look at Swansea, Fulham and Norwich – but as owners, you must demonstrate you care about the club, its fan base and its local community.
Never knowing love,
What type of a reader are you? Do you soak up scenes written by others? Imagine them for days on end? Find choice gems of passages that affect you for life? Do you want your readers to feel this way about your own prose?
Just like the vast majority of medievalish fantasies.
Happy Birthday Mom.
1tsp pepper
So. I've tackled religion, something I've never really written about before on this blog. Hopefully I've done so respectfully! And I'd be interested to hear your perspective. Do you feel religion had any impact on your educational choices (either to have more or less religion in your environment)? What's been your experience with the school-free community and religion?
"If you destroy a free market, you create a black market."
I am going to be "Recyclable" for Halloween. So I'm going to take the needle and thread and sew the bottles and cans to my clothing along my arms and legs, and maybe a few on my torso. Then I will crumble up newspaper and staple/tape it to myself all over the place. On top of that, I'm going to try and make some sort of helmet/mask out of a card board box.
What suffers is the truth, and—of course—Africa. We are so cowed by the moist-eyed mantras of the left and the oath-laden platitudes of Bono and Geldof, we are forced to accept collective responsibility for the bloody mess that is now Africa. It paralyses us while excusing the black continent and its rulers.
8. “We’re allowed to find other girls pretty. It’s usually nothing to be jealous over”
‘Watch. Listen. The words to the next song you hear. The information in the next article you read. The story line of the next movie you watch. The chance utterance of the next person you meet. Or the whisper of the next river, the next ocean, the next breeze that caresses your ear…’
Not heard..She had not seen...and the voice
I don't mean for this to sound like a pity party in the least. I love my life and recognize that I have more things to be grateful for than I can count. But real life is happy, sad, fun, hard, and everything in between.
Sometimes, people should just not try very hard to talk up something they're obviously not very interested in. Let that be a lesson to you, John Key.
Ok… now that we know it’s one of the good guys… how do we cook this stuff?
I really wish my child would take his nap... there's LOTS of laundry to fold and LOTS of dog hair to vaccume (I hate trying to spell that word).
That’s great stuff, and as a gay man, based on that information alone, Ron would stand out as a hero to me. But in his first post at Bilerico Project, No, to the Notion of Transgender, he instead takes the role of an uninformed and insensitive critic of transgender issues and individuals. He uses language that demeans the transgender experience and is outright offensive. Now perhaps Ron attempted to offer a post-modern philosophical musing about the nature of identity and that our idea of gender arises in part from a social construct, (something that Rikki Wilchens does expertly in the book Queer Theory, Gender Theory: An Instant Primer.) In his blog post, Ron failed miserably.
Instead of taking tough decisions — like challenging Dizaei — they indulge in politicised manoeuvres designed to protect their own backs and further their own careers.
and maybe you have found someone who is truly wonderful
A sad looking picture. I feel
“Then you’ll be seeing the emperor eventually anyway,” Bernie said.
When I'm primary nurse in the NCCU (we usually have three nurses, with one taking three patients, another taking two or three, and a third helping out in the absence of a patient care aide), I have a patient load of three. These are acutely ill people who are generally leaping out of bed or desatting or doing some combination of the two, sometimes with a third fun thing thrown in.
"I don't get this."
Brauerei Eichhof Eichhof Lager
that chug round and round
FotoFest 2012 Biennial in Houston, Texas. The granddaddy of all portfolio reviews. Four days of intense, single-minded, intimidating, exciting 20-minute sessions where you show top photo industry professionals from around the world, prints and books of the portfolio you hope they will want to exhibit, publish, write about, talk about, celebrate far and wide. If you're an emerging photographer, you dream of being discovered at FotoFest. It has happened to others, so why not you?
“There’s a clear link between muthi and business,” said Simon Fellows, author of a shocking report on the body parts business in Mozambique and South Africa.
2 Do you think about food or your weight constantly?
Okay, here’s the blankity-blank speech:
Because the banks and AIG are so big, we're told, we can't afford to make their counterparty/creditors/investors eat the loss. That may be true in some cases. In others, not so much.
The UN observer mission is watching the situation in several Syrian cities including Damascus. Its head, Norwegian General Robert Mood, has told the media that the observers will cooperate with the Syrian government in implementing Kofi Annan’s settlement plan. He also said that the conflicting Syrian sides must renounce violence and enter into a dialogue.
Sailing to alien lands in the purple twilight
YES…that’s 14 free Silhouette Craft Cutters up for grabs! (Some of the drawings may have ended but many still open)
Heart of Gold
I've had to hide what I'm working on for SALT tomorrow :)
As a child a large amount of time is spent learning and accumulating knowledge and skills. Indeed it could be said that the learning of skills and knowledge is a life long pursuit. The accumulation of knowledge, could be said to be a double-edged sword, as knowledge can be used for bad and good. so this could point to the idea of responsibility and knowledge, indeed developing good ethics might be said to be a useful prerequisite to gaining knowledge that could be extremely bad or good depending on how it is used.
1982 album was sufficiently avant-garde to alienate some of
Going back to work after a beautiful long break makes everything seem so...I don't know...serious? Painstaking. Tiring. You name it. I'm quite frankly still adjusting to sleeping in so much over break. Not going to lie. It got excessive. 9:30 exessive. Even 10:00 exessive. Oops. :P
The Internet is rather shy about providing much more information about the band, and all I can really glean from the limited scraps available is that Sounds magazine rated them highly and predicted they would conquer all before them (which obviously never happened), that somebody financed an American tour for them (so they did better than a lot of other UK indie acts of the same period who were not granted permits), and that they released an album called "King Buffalo". That's it. If anybody has anything more, they know what to do.
of Jesus' work complete!
9 Cabaret Voltaire 3:57
Conveniently located one escalator down from the main casino.
The Fates hovered in stasis overhead. Hands joined, eyes closed, and oblivious to the small girl below.
Writing a daily blog?
How come some things are only ever felt by the strength of their absence? The released tension of an unwound spring rattles through me. I am marshmallow as we settle in to our space on the floor. One hand holding the other. Our impromptu safety line once again reinstated.
Procrastination has always been a hobby of mine. Occasionally I’d flirt with going pro, but it never seemed like a real opportunity until I had children. Put me in coach; I’m ready for the Procrastination Olympics.
then what?what else???
* Quest Crew as Li'l Rosero Dancers
We will share the pain and sadness, life will seem easier that way,
government and perversion of your bodies, just as they did in bloodlust
The Patent Office’s case was that reasonable care had not been shown. M had decided, as with previous years, to defer payment until the end of the extended renewal period and had either misread or misunderstood the clear reminder letter from his patent attorneys, with the result that he failed to realise that the final deadline for the EP(UK) patent differed from that of the other countries.
* 3 carrots sliced in 1/4 inch discs
3. Boise State QB Kellen Moore
Bin Laden, according to the source, was suffering from a serious lung complication and succumbed to the disease in mid-December, in the vicinity of the Tora Bora mountains. The source claimed that bin Laden was laid to rest honorably in his last abode and his grave was made as per his Wahabi belief.
It would naturally follow then, that in the same context and sentence structure, the natural body is vanquished and they receive a spiritual body, again, this is confirmed when it states that Jesus himself BECAME a life giving SPIRIT.
Objectivism holds that any conversation on social relations i.e. politics must begin with rights.
The problem here is that the Ebay court provided no guidance on what types of remedies are appropriate for the court to consider, and how the remedies are applied.
A pair of Annie pins, still on the cardboard, from the first weekend the Charlotte Avenue Great Escape was open (originally from when the 1982 movie came out, I suppose). Which must have been before the flood...which means it was at least two years ago, possibly two and half. I'm crazy about Little Orphan Annie (as you could imagine) and how cute is it that there's an Annie AND Daddy Warbucks pin? I'm almost too in love with these to wear them, but you know I'm going to do it anyway.
It isn’t too late. You can still return to me with all your heart.
FAR FAR away from home.
ye then be risen with Christ, seek those things which are above, where Christ sitteth on the right hand of God. Set your affection on things above, not on things on the earth. For ye are dead, and your life is hid with Christ in God. When Christ, who is our life, shall appear, then shall ye also appear with him in glory. Mortify therefore your members which are upon the earth; fornication, uncleanness, inordinate affection, evil concupiscence, and covetousness, which is idolatry: For which things' sake the wrath of God cometh on the children of disobedience: In the which ye also walked some time, when ye lived in them.
If you were at Cinefest 32 and saw last night's presentation of The Street of Forgotten Men, this blog would love to hear from you. Please post your thoughts or observations about the film and its screening in the comments field below. What did you think?
I’ve been thinking a lot about photography these days. Tim gave me a beautiful new camera for my birthday and it’s been a lot of fun to move away from “auto” shooting and think more purposefully about each image. Of course, all my subjects — Lucas, Tali and Tim– remain less than willing participants in my desire to pause time (both in reality and through photography).
I didn’t tell my boyfriend I baked him a surprise (/experiment that might be horrible), and was in a different room when he opened the fridge and yelled, “PIE!!!” I gently corrected him that no, it was Philadelphia Cream Cheese in its best form, a cheesecake. His face lit up even more, and he even considered skipping dinner and heading straight to the cheesecake, but I wouldn’t allow it. I served it with Light Cool Whip, and he absolutely loved it. Success! Next week, I will try mixing in raspberries and chocolate chips with the basic mix (cream cheese, sugar, and eggs)… hopefully he will be just as delighted.
Now, for the real reason why I’m writing this post: I finally finished “Darkfever”! It was pretty good but I don’t think I’ll continue the series. I’ll write a review on it whenever school is done. I am still reading “City of Fallen Angels” and I already have the next book picked out to read after that one.
11. King Of The Beach - Wavves
when I am feeling overwhelmed, exercise really helps me get back on track!
His history of the street was first published to coincide with the Atlantic Antic in 1989, and it was written for The Phoenix, an old community paper that focused on Brooklyn's rising from the ashes (Don't forget, the Bronx wasn't the only place that was burning.) It's lengthy, but it's a good read. Check it out here: Atlantic Avenue: Portrait of a Brooklyn Street in 1885
So, here it is. My 40th birthday just kind of did it's sneaking up on me! It's hard to believe. I had the perfect combination of family and alone time to celebrate. I was able to go and spend a few days in Telluride - Mountain Village, CO. I just adore spending time in both of these places! I had two nights in a fabulous hotel due to the fact they were comped! Lucky me as the room had this amazing view. Can I say I felt extremely pampered and spoiled for 2 1/2 straight days. I swam in the pool, soaked in the hottub with fabulous mountain views, had a facial, shopped downtown at Telluride's NOEL Night, rode the tram at twilight just as the sun was setting and actually got to read the paper while having breakfast! It was pure bliss for 2 1/2 days!
Many online advices are given to build your own cockpit which can be taken into consideration.
Here we go. First, a sneak peek:
And the rest of the weekend was filled with laughter, family, memories and smiles ~ lots of smiles as we finally were able to get family pictures taken (another part of their surprise). We had not had family pictures taken since I was a sophomore in college and they were for the church directory.
The Hornets shot .511 from the field, including a 10-of-20 performance from the three point line, while holding the Bronchos to just .439 shooting from the field.
It’s called information warfare and they have entire sections just specializing in this type of MIND CONTROL.
The opportunities in basketball, baseball, and perhaps soccer and wrestling are there, too.
My sweet lord, surely if god had a second son, it would be Sean Sherlock. He has done the difficult task of wrangling copyright law on the internet and done it brilliantly. I am so impressed with Sean that I have made an animation of him chasing copyright through the internet, you can view it by clicking the button below. Sean puts the 33 in 1337.
There is a smidge of Ketchum's famous gore throughout the movie but you have to make it to the ending for the really good stuff. Chris has finally gone too far when he kills Peg's teacher by feeding her to the dogs, and Peg finally sets The Woman free from the cellar to have her fun. Oh, it's glorious. Face-biting, body-throwing, body-hacking, heart-ripping, and heart-eating - all the bad guys in the movie finally get their comeuppance and it is bloody fantastic, if you'll pardon the pun. The gore effects are really well done here and as in Offspring, the filmmakers leave nothing to the imagination and show the audience these kills with all the blood and intestines and organs in their arsenal.
As black as midnight, little calf,
“We told him not to do that anymore,” he sighs, “but he’s a loose cannon.”
Now, as I'll be at the Norwich Makers Market on Saturday (St Thomas' Church, Earlham Road 11 - 4 if you're around these here parts) I've been trying to get a few more new pieces made.
6:00 AM - 9:00 AM - NPR Morning Edition
First American Edition
A review of the earlier case in 2010 sparked a wave of arrests and charges.
in the dark behind my teeth
Because, let's face it, it feels good to do something good! And any excuse to pop to TKMaxx to 'replace' all that stuff you just gave away, right?!
“My parents is not like others parent. They seems didn’t want me in this world. They treat me like I’m their slave, their money-machine. They treat me badly… so badly. They lock me in my room, cut every connection device and…”I take a deep breath and have to clench my chest when I feel I can’t catch the air. My face burning and I know what to come.
When I came back that evening to get the horses back inside I learned that she had jumped over the electric fence and ventured into the private garden of the owner of the place. That was not a popular idea.
“So if you look at how progress is made and where competitive advantage is created, there’s no doubt that the ability to use software tools effectively is critical to succeeding in today’s global knowledge economy.”
Well here we are for another edition of “Beem-bomisms Fridays”, where I give you a taste of the ridiculous and wacky things that come out of my children’s mouths. Even though last Friday had a different name, it’s the same idea.
Hand knits are like works of art – if you don’t have the right canvas, the paint looks like crap. Sweaters, shawls, shrugs, skirts, socks and any other ‘s’s you can think of need the right base to look their best. This means: supportive underwear, shirts and pants (or trousers if you’re in the UK) in a complimentary style and colour and appropriate footwear. It may sound like a pain, but trust me, get these elements right and your knits will look fantastic.
dances, boys' hands fidget in pockets.
Popeye the Sailor Meets Ali Baba’s 40 Thieves (US…Dave Fleischer)
What this rant stems from is a sign in my neighbors yard urging people to vote on the marriage act to keep marriage traditional. In my mind, no matter how you slice it, that is basically saying, "I don't like gay people."
I told him to let the driver know where he needed to get out, that they would probably let him know when they got there.
1. In a large bowl combine flour, yeast, and salt. Add 1 1/2 cups water, and stir until blended; dough will be shaggy and sticky. Cover bowl with plastic wrap. Let dough rest at least 12 hours, preferably about 18, at warm room temperature, about 70 degrees.
(I know... WHO DOES THAT?! Matt Morris should just be thankful Google and Facebook weren't around then. Just sayin'.)
For instance, the organizers for today’s rally want to muster at Merdeka, or Independence, Square, the swath of land in downtown Kuala Lumpur where Malaysia first hoisted its national flag after securing independence from Britain in 1957. They are demanding that the country’s electoral rolls are cleaned up to prevent fraudulent voting and that alleged biases within the country’s election agency are removed. In addition, they want international observers to monitor the polls – which must be called by next March – and also ensure that all political parties get similar access to government-controlled broadcasters and newspapers, who dominate the media landscape in Malaysia. The protests also want to enable Malaysians living overseas to be able to cast ballots.
Adapted from the Crumb Blog and shockingly at the end she says for a vegan version omit the pork and fish sauce – both thins I did because we didn’t have them on hand. So for you vegetarians and vegans out there you too can enjoy this quick Asian inspired meal.
We'll just keep it between you and me that we didn't quite make it to the top.
“The payments are in recognition of the great contribution to service delivery made by former councillors to improve people’s lives.”
Pack 5:
Note: I have removed some of the prescribed exercises as I think those are better handled by a professional speech and/ or physiotherapist. For a more detailed list of exercises visit: http://strokehelp.wordpress.com/speech-exercises-2/
Finally, some people evaluated the evidence before them and believed Jesus was who He said He was. I love Peter’s answer to Jesus’ query whether the 12 disciples would also leave. “Lord, to whom would we go? You have the words that give eternal life. We believe, and we know you are the Holy One of God.” John 6:68-69. There are many in the church today who believe and know that Jesus is our only hope of salvation.
Zzip Stop: 217 W Main St, La Farge, WI 54639, 608-625-2203. Offers B20 (good for any diesel engine). Open 24 HRS.
The 10 day moving average of the equity only ISE call put ratio fell to 163 as of today’s close. That is the lowest level since August 2010. The 5 day moving average fell to just 146 which is the lowest since early July, when the S&P 500 index found support after last summer’s correction:
In modern India this victory in Bangla Desh is forgotten victory. Even way back then in 1972, immediately after the victory, the full magnitude of the victory never quite sank into minds of most Indians.
Next up, a story of kids and adults behaving badly in SUMMER GAMES. 12 year old Nic and his little brother Agostino are on holiday on the Tuscan coast with their abusive father and their mother who has returned after some absence (she insists for the kids, not for the father, but there's still a little something there.) Meanwhile, Marie and her little sister Patty are also on holiday there, with their mother and no father in the picture at all. Nic finds a shed in a cornfield , and brings the whole gang there (including a fifth kid who really isn't as interesting as the main four. In fact, the interesting ones are Nic and Marie) at first to see a dead body (that turns out to be a scarecrow) and then to invent some rather perverse games about killers, policemen, and punishments. Nic brags about how he can't feel pain (easier than admitting he feels anything for Marie) and Marie for her part totally shuns Nic. Or at least tries to. It's an interesting and often unsettling (particularly the dog scene) coming-of-age story that in its own way is about the importance of good parenting, but more about we manage to muddle through in the absence of it.
“You can’t diet all the time,” I replied. “Mrs. Sandra is probably really looking forward to tonight.”
The View From Above, and the Exercise of Death
They made no mention of Muhammad or Muslims or Islam at all, at least until around the start of the 8th century. In case you’re thinking that there’d be no reason for outsiders to mention the religion of some obscure far-off tribe, remember that starting with the date of Muhammad’s purported death in 632, Arabs galloped out of the desert and conquered or captured almost the entirety of the Near East, the Middle East and North Africa in just a few decades. They encountered many cultures and civilizations, but none of those conquered peoples seem even to have heard of Islam or Muhammad.
No, but i have a tree that plays with me
"We arrived Kampala around 10:00 at night and within the first 10 minutes of being in the car with Jalia and Daniel, the head artisans who create our goods in Uganda say, “We were living hand to mouth for so long. Being poor in our country is as bad as being diagnosed with HIV. Because of Noonday, we have enough for our family and we now get to
Crumbs. Double Crumbs.
Here is a picture taken on her 4th birthday . I am in the picture also standing next to her the cake is in front of me (ahhhhhhhhh)
by John Galsworthy
Well, I guess I can’t complain too much. After all, I am on spring break right now. And you know what? The groundhog lied! At least as far as Michigan is concerned. Last week we got some snow, yes, but this week, it’s supposed to get close to 70 degrees. Florida? Who needs Florida when the weather is like this?
Still want to find an agent and get a book deal? Okay, write for yourself and write the best book you can. In order to do that, join SCBWI, find a good critique group, learn to re-write and develop a very thick skin for rejection.
Psalm 115:15-16
On my way to work today I noticed that there is a contrast of architecture. Not sure how I feel about all the new glass towers I see growing out of the ground. I may be a little nostalgic and like the older buildings their construction was solid and their spaces grand. The new buildings seem to be designed with only functionality in mind. Well that is my two cents for the day.
4) Make Patterns: With erasers above
Any question let me know.
What do you do if you have built a successful business and want to sell it? The first thing is to purchase Built to Sell by John Warrillow ($24.95, Flip Jet Media, Toronto). The author started and sold four companies, becoming in the process an expert on how to get the most value out of a business when selling it. He is a small business expert who is widely quoted in publicans from Business Week and Inc Magazine to USA Today and the Wall Street Journal. In this book he reveals the secret of building a business to sell, offering eight steps to making a business sellable. “You can always run a company as if it will last forever, and yet you should also strive constantly to maximize its value, building in the qualities that allow it to be sold at any moment.” Good advice.
And so the last few weeks have been taken up with preparing our properties for the season ahead, we always like to upgrade interiors, carry out painting and then of course there are the pools and gardens, the latter of which have sadly suffered from one of the shortest but coldest winter snaps since 1948.
We rolled out of the Pioneer RV Park early on Wednesday, August 4th. We heard the fish were running and so we decided to go back to the Whitehorse Rapids Fish Hatchery before making our way to Muncho Lake Provincial Park, British Columbia. As it turned out, there wasn't much to see at the Hatchery because the fish had just started to trickle through - they had counted only three or four so far.
Answer: If by keep closed, one is referring to a motor-mouth or a full purse, then I say “hear, hear.” Actually, those needn’t be opened on a plane either. I spilled the contents of my purse on a flight once and it wasn’t pretty. My favorite lip balm is probably still rolling around on some Delta flight, tripping up little old ladies in velour track suits. And as for the blabby guy with the carrying voice that seems to be on every red-eye flight I am, well, I guess I didn’t need those five hours of sleep anyway.
A seriously injured Mozambique national walks out of a field after being beaten by South African residents during ongoing xenophobia clashes in Ramaphosa squatter camp east of Johannesburg, South Africa, 20 May 2008. Picture Credit: EPA/KIM LUDBROOK - Sourced from: news.monstersandcritics.com - (More pics on the website -- See also: Jon Hrusa Photography
There are two flavors of temporal data support available in a DB2 10 new-function mode environment (and they can be employed separately or together for a given table): system time (this has to do with automatic saving of "before" images of rows targeted by UPDATE and DELETE operations in a history table, with information indicating the timestamps between which a row was in the "current" versus the "history" state) and business time (this enables, among other things, a "future insert" capability, whereby a row with, for example, next year's price for a product can be added to a table without affecting programs querying "currently valid" rows).
never used them once. It's amazing what you might find when you start
As though released from a spell, we took a few sedate steps, then broke into a run for the gate. We didn’t stop till we were out of the grounds. Impatient, at last, to discover the extent of his bounty, we squatted by the cowsheds, held our lanterns over the book, and saw that he had written ‘Two Shillings’. This was quite a good start. No one of any worth in the district would dare to give us less than the Squire.
When I got back to school last week, I fell asleep while doing some reading, so I ended up deciding to just go to bed at 8:30pm. I got 12 hours of sleep that night. One of my professors was really surprised that I did that and suggested that maybe I’m not sleeping as much as I think I am at night. I’m starting to wonder if she’s right because I’ll go to bed at a decent time and sleep in and still be tired. Then there are the nights when I can’t fall asleep and end up in odd positions like sleeping on the opposite side of my bed. I don’t know. And I don’t take naps really.
Vintage Lamps...love them. We can never have to much light in our lives.
Strategy Analytics predicts that advertiser spend on mobile media will almost double from $6.3 billion to $11.6 billion. Certainly there are plenty of marketers diving in, and they’ve made their share of mistakes along the way.
Intelligence: Described as the glory of God, “in other words, light and truth” (D&C 93:36). As Boyd K. Packer taught, intelligence is to be gained by “facing the right way” in obeying church leaders and avoiding truths that “are not very useful.”
(1) Wags Nature valley Q = 0.50 off
I was not surprised that after only a few months Amy’s blog became a huge success and won her the accolade of becoming one of Budget Travels’s picks for 10 best expat blogs in Paris. I was even less surprised when after her second year of blogging she was offered a book deal.
me and my teddy bear, we just play and play all day......
This is a Thank you card ( for all those Christmas gifties) featuring my kids. I have a tutorial on how it was made at THE HYBRID CHICK.
".... Alan Goldsmith, the guy who did the deal with Cinelli for Western States Imports (WSI) has written to me and filled in many details that clear up questions about this bike's origins, who built it and where.
Wynkoop Brewing Company Patty's Chile Beer
Rather than saying women are doing an excellent thing by becoming good at professional sport, I’d prefer the book recognize that elite-level sport is basically a wasteful sham. Every Olympic medal “we” earn in London is going to cost us a million dollars. Personally I feel that’s immoral, given that we have so many other problems in our society. Even if we didn’t have other problems, I’d prefer we spent the money on community sport for obese kids.
Health protection issues are specifically dealt with in Article 2.1 of the IP Chapter. This provision stresses the importance of the Doha Declaration on TRIPS Agreement and Public Health, adopted by the WTO Ministerial Conference in November 2001, which reaffirms flexibility of WTO Member states in relaxing patent protection for better access to essential medicines.
02 Hookian Mindz-Freshmess (Red Snapper Mix)
November 5 ~ 10:00-4:00
A music producer, can in the same way, work with an artist or a song and take it to the best place for serving it to the public, putting it on an album or whatever comparison you like. Whether the song is stripped down to a simple acoustic style track, to all the embellishments and spices of horns, harmonies and whatever else.
A: Lay down with my pajamas
I have wanted to use cold cream for a while now, but I kept chickening out, thinking it would make me break out. I didn't understand how using cream could remove make-up well without causing acne. Then I did a google search on cold cream and those blogs I found talking about it LOVED it.
I say ‘surprise’ partly because I’m in an inverted-comma sort of mood, and also because it’s not really a ‘surprise’ as I’m already sitting up in bed in my best silk dressing gown awaiting my special MD tray when they come in.
Broken and Beautiful by Mark Schultz
Is anyone really surprised?
Close mother-son relationships are abundant, but they are kept in the closet. While fathers are lauded for teaching their daughters traditionally masculine tasks or skills, mothers are shamed for doing the same thing (for example, teaching a son to knit or just talk more openly about his feelings).
Bloomberg denied responsibility and Pacific Crest owner Matt Hewitt wouldn’t identify his client. Jonathan Trichter, who runs the Pace Poll, told the Politicker that it was likely “a special interest group” trying to figure out whom to endorse. Though Ferrer at that point had only expressed qualms about Atlantic Yards—his stated opposition was announced late in the campaign—it’s just as likely that Forest City Ratner paid for that poll.
HIT A public/private win
Because of the potential for the plague to be used in a biological weapon, the government approached Johnson & Johnson and asked that the company pursue federal approval, the Newark Star-Ledger reported.
I pick her up and place her on my chest promptly, of course. She has me well trained.
Omaha , Nebraska north to Sioux Falls South Dakota
Naturally, posts can be a combination of both these criteria.
As the army corps advances.
Alex approached one of the safari organizers and told her how cool it was to have these guys in costume adding some atmosphere! He also asked when they were going to perform.
Students
Writing Lists by Nicole of Teaching With Style: "This set of 10 lists is perfect for using during Daily 5. In my classroom, if students choose Work on Writing, they can work on their story from Writer's Workshop, start a new story, write a letter to a friend, or write a list. " (K-3)
The Times article is charming. About artists, a couple living in twin houses, one pink one blue, connected by a common patio. Read it and find out how they came to this arrangement. The houses are charming to look at too.
For those that say yes… well holy sugar nuts batman…
To her credit, this woman seemed apologetic. The administration, she told me, said they had to go with the data they had. They could not take my word for it that my daughter speaks english, I could not fill out another form. So she simply wrote down every word Khubz said in the 10 minute visit. That was apparently enough to make her hand cramp up. She seemed to think this new data would be enough to get Khubz placed correctly.
Volunteer and help support good biking in Oregon and SW Washington! Lend a hand if you can - email me to sign up.
This is a handcut chipboard tag, painted with Adirondak paint dabber Lettuce and stamped with pine trees in silver metallic pigment ink. Christmas paper is torn and layered on with cream, then deep green and a christmas ribbon. Noel is die cut chipboard, inked with silver metallic and frosted with Crystal Ice Stickles.
- If you're using a toilet attached to your master bathroom, like we are, be warned: At 4:30am when you hear the tiny, adorable paws scraping that tray at a decibel level akin to a locomotive, you're going to contemplate killing the cat(s). And yourself.
"I really feel so tired of fighting the world all alone and with no money," she once wrote to her mother.
The unique thing about different authors is their take on how they use language to communicate their stories to their readers. This relates directly to that unique sense of voice and style, but the way in which a writer expresses him or herself is vitally important – the use of language is perhaps the most exclusive aspect of a writer.
"I got this movie in that Canadian package, never got released. But I found the guy who did it. Wanna do the commentary?"
My twitter buddy, Nikki of Nikkilooch said: (this totally cracked me up...many used the word "crazy" to describe my commitment to the Bundt)
In this picture (starting from left to right) is Leah (My brother's) Lily (Michelle's) and Ani and Ammon.
That to me is the spirit of this music: that which does not grow is dead. I love the way Bill Frisell defines music. He says it's "a place where no one gets hurt and you can do whatever you want." I think that's all the context/message/identity you need. Now pick up that goddamn horn and say something honest.
In the Light
I would just like to put forward a few key issues that I think are paramount for future discussions and consideration in the planning and implementation of a written document.
I have a couple of projects coming up that I think will encourage me to spend more time here, sharing my crafts and photos.
a. make it a simple set, like 500m Front Crawl fast, 300m Front Crawl pull x 4.
However, some unruly Bersih protesters had also defied police orders to disperse even after the rally ended.
Mario Bava's sublime ghost story has lost none of its power down the years, taking the unquiet spirit of Melissa Grapps and embarking on a journey through mist-shrouded locales where the line between the living and the dead is wafer thin. Unfortunately, a big-screen airing of this classic was let down by a less-than-stellar print, but the existence of an excellent DVD does convey much of its power to chill.
Using a free standing mixer with whisk attachment or a hand mixer, whisk the egg whites till frothy.
I returned to Warcraft this past fall. I’d stopped playing in May-ish and missed pretty much everything from May to August. I rejoined my guild and found that they needed me almost right off the bat because of the difficulty of recruiting for 25-mans on our server. It took me a little while to get a grasp on my moonkin-ness again, but that was nothing compared to the Firelands learning curve.
7. When using a floor machine keep the cable behind you and your line of work at all times. Only cover a manageable area at any one time to prevent over-stretching and fatigue.
In the wild, salmon absorb carotenoids from eating pink krill. On the aquafarm, their rich pink hue is supplied by canthaxanthin, a synthetic pigment manufactured by Hoffman-La Roche. Fish farmers can choose just what shade of peach their fish will display from the pharmaceutical company’s trademarked SalmoFan, a color swatch similar to those you’d find in a paint store. Without help from Hoffman LaRoche, the flesh of farmed salmon would be a pale halibut grey.
Ree says to bake these 13 to 17 minutes, but I found I had to bake mine for closer to 20 minutes before they were done. While they were baking I made the Maple icing. Powdered sugar, butter, milk, coffee (yes, coffee) and maple flavoring. Whisk it up and while the rolls are still in the pan, hot and fresh from the oven, pour the icing over them, getting it around the sides. Ree says not to be afraid of really dumping the icing on as the rolls will soak up much of that yummy-ness.
I woke up this morning excited about going to work – I think for the first time I was actually disappointed that it was a Saturday. I am sure this feeling will pass as I get more stressed, but I’m just so happy (literally, smiley happy) to be enjoying my new job.
My peppers are doing well in the greenhouse: they love the 90F temps. I took my cell phone out there, and the wireless signal was strong--so this autumn, I shall be working with my laptop in the greenhouse.
Let me just say that I love Disney movies. I am 21 years old and I still watch them more than I should. While watching one, one night I got me to thinking what Disney actually teaches little children. Now I’m warning you that some things are a bit offensive so if you don’t have a sense of humor please stop reading right now. This is just for fun remember ! Read at your own risk…..
It’s your turn to reign
That floats on high o'er vales and hills,
Ugh. Just leave me abandoned Taj.
I am what I am. No fuzz to talk about right and wrongness, if it works I am up for it! I set my own rules and regulations for what I strive for, at some cases this goes towards stupidity. From these lessons I learn humble- and open-mindedness. Strong at will, living with girlfriend and our dog - Faith. Coaching and constantly challenging the body and mind with: Foods, exercises, cognitive exercises, going through thought systems and so on. Keeps the mind sharp and the day fresh. Be spontaneous! What goes in most come out!
Donations over £10 will receive a mention of them or their group in the event programme (as long as the group abides by the ideals of the conference - you will be offered a refund if the group you wish to mention is considered unsuitable).
Ah Kow Mushroom Minced Pork Mee
They mingle not with their laughing comrades again:
Shaw GM, Gold EB. Methodological considerations in the study of parental occupational exposures and congenital malformations in offspring. Scand J Work Environ Health 1988; 14: 344-355.
SLDKGJSHFGKJSHFGKUSDFJHGKLJSDFHGNKLSJDHFGKSJDH FGKUJSFGHKSERHTGLIKUHTGLISERHGJK,LDLIUGBYHSGITYH EIRGTHLERHGTLIEAHGLJKSADEHGLJKAEHGLJSERGLSELIGU HSGRHSERGHERGH
It’s been a year now since we got introduced to Tsididi. I wasn’t around at their launch party, but I saw it everywhere on social media gore ba re gona le selo ba re ke Tsididi Ice. At first I thought to myself, how can young guys think they can make a business out of selling just Ice, I mean really just ice? Well I guess that was just the beginning of the story, cause what Tsididi ice is today, a lot of businesses or rather establishments as I’d like to refer to them hasn’t reached.
When I knew him, he was not a winner yet but his appeal was growing. He remembered what it was like before girls liked him. And I think that grounded the guy. Maybe that’s what we had in common – I started comedy late and knew life away from comedy.
OnStar’s real-time data connection also helps drivers maximize the environmental benefits of owning a Volt, even when not in the vehicle. The application’s intuitive Charge Status feature simplifies setting the charge time. Rather than using battery power, the application allows owners to start the Volt remotely to pre-condition the interior temperature using power from the grid. This preserves the battery charge for driving without gasoline.
Bay leaf 1
Listen to your poop…it could save your life.
There are various benefits to building your own conservatory. The main advantage is definitely the substantial cost savings involved. You can create a bright, flexible and practical space in a very effective way. Adding a DIY conservatory will undoubtedly add value to your home as it gives an additional space and often does not require planning permission, which an extension would normally need.
I’m back after a little break from this blog. I felt like it was taking to much time away from me and I wasn’t getting enough out of it, so a little r&r was needed. I do appreciate all the kind things people have been saying lately, but I’m still not sure if I’ll be posting everyday like I have for the past 3 months. We’ll see how things go.
Something in the atmosphere is telling me it won’t be here for long
sea glass mixed with seaweed and wire ... yummy!
When you realize that you no longer need the crutches of the past, that you no longer smoke the cigarettes or the weed, that you no longer watch Jerry Springer or engage in the neighborhood or workplace gossip, that you no longer seek outside of yourself – in another person for instance – for completion, the quality of your experiences take on an entirely different tone, and your worldview expands as you become aware of alternative perspectives and the interconnectedness of humanity as a whole.
till the last sinews our heartbeats
The Government of 1948 that instituted Apartheid, it must never be forgotten, did not invent racial segregation. Race has mattered at the Cape since its founding in the 17th Century and all the 1948 Government did was to make law what already existed in practice. However, this, in the view of many commentators, was its greatest failure. In making explicit what was implicit, the regime sowed the seeds of its own downfall.
Sewing in 2010 what a huge blessing!
We must not forget that the ruling class would resist to the end.
Last night I went to see my friends’ band The Little Black Dress. They were playing at Rivoli (Toronto) for their album release party. I did a review of their new Album Spotlight a few weeks ago, so go and read it if you haven’t done so already: http://blonderobyngirl.wordpress.com/2012/04/08/spotlight/
Emergency Loan Program:
6. Finally, what are your thoughts on the current state of music in general and the place of your own genre within the wider sphere of popular music?
It has been found in many of the Pakistani British families that they exists an inbreeding depression syndrome which have led to pre mature deaths of many kids. The govt of Britain chooses not to interfere as it may turn into a political fight where they may be accused of islamophobia but fact and rationality of genetics give credibility to practice of not marrying your cousins and into your clan.
02 Safe In My Skin 04:34
So in honor of Poem in Your Pocket Day, I offer the following:
Don’t believe me? I mean, look at Tom Selleck’s mustache. It’s undeniable. I’m actually jealous that 1991′s “The Avengers” gets that ‘stache. What do we get? Joss Whedon. On second thought, our universe wins.
21The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you all. Amen.
Thee greatest worry for the dark-state is not this group or that, not one ideology or the other but the mass take up of such by the people, the mobilisation of the body-politic by the people, for it is the people themselves that have the power to change the course of history, to break the manacles set about them and to usher in a new day. So the state and those behind them use any and all tactic, they create, fashion and augment disharmony, succeeding amongst the chaos, our people to engineered, march towards dark days and the very movement that should and could if mobilised correctly aid them, pays little care to the marching multitude, as upon the sidelines they war. Yet what decent man or women would want any of this, what person possessed of their senses would wish to join any party or group that proclaims nationalistic or patriotic tendencies, if they could but once glimpse the war within, the ongoing and rampant self-harm run riot.
Heather Draper – I am most excited about a new home past clients in Calgary just purchased, I love working with repeat clients, they expect my crazy personality and trust me as a designer.
Federal law should prohibit flight without helmets, people.
Probably like most of you readers, I've always been a sucker for disaster stories. Everytime I watched TV as a teen and a story about some massacre came on, or some typhoon, and I saw children suddenly orphaned, my heart went out to them.
The elites cannot face that immigrants might want to take revenge on us. Our pretense that they are harmless undervalues their humanity and leads our rulers into dangerous absurdities like police chiefs alerting community leaders before they raid for terrorists or explosives!
3. To encourage YOU! :) If you are having one of those mommy days where you feel like a failure, come by and be reminded that we all have those days, and God gives us grace to face them and strength to get through them!
We had been warned about crazy traffic and parking woes on campus the day of His Holiness' visit, so I opted to just bring my girl along to work with me. She got herself all purdied up for the D-L
Well done Zurich! (The firm that shut down its insurance business in Leeds a few years ago leaving hundreds out of work).
.. I was asking her to suggest me a sesoning .. and she said.. I could use Coriander and Parsley in Rösti and they will make a lovely Scandivian dish.
Every driver I see wearing a hat in car.
It's probably about time to "Stalin" my FB friend list again, as one of the people I actually care about refers to it as. I mean, if I wasn't friends with you at one time, and you're not interesting now, why do I care? Answer? I don't. I just clicked "Accept," because it was easy.
Live Sincerely. Now those are two words that'll turn "The End" upside down. It's never too early to start.
The dignity of the human being is not in the hands of the human beings with the most power or fear tactics over certain groups of human beings, for example at work, socially, civically, environmentally, politically, or even in their own families. The dignity of the human being is in the hand of each individual human being. It is God given.
excrements of the Jews’ bellies; for the deserters used to swallow such pieces
In reality what's happening is that the government is bent on expanding private provision of our free health service, probably copying the US model. If the bill becomes law, the NHS will be torn open and left exposed for the vultures of the corporate sector to feast on its entrails. The juiciest contracts will go to the richest firms which will be in a better financial position to bid for them. Joe and Joanna Public will be left with a local hospital that will resemble the landscape in the novel The Road. We'll probably even get the cannibals as a side dish, too.
Staff member: What show was this on?
We may have been a bit annoying. We were directed to a side room we didn't fancy, so remained hovering in the main tea room. Directed to another table, we suddenly saw that a prime table by the window was being vacated, so swiftly nabbed that instead. Maybe this caused offence. We sat there... and sat there... then when we asked if we could order, a young woman dressed as a waitress informed us that it wasn't waitress service. You have to go to the counter and pay in advance. 'It's a bit like Russia,' Wendy muttered.
And now finally we see the protest on Wall Street and in many other cities around the country attended by many of our young people. This new generation is showing us the way. By their demonstrations and protests they obviously see the dilemma. Finally, the real problem will come out of the darkness and the young will lead us into the light.
Series: None
The Reconstructionist represents my effort to explore this conflict inherent in the work. The problems of accident and fate that Boggs describes on page 69 run through the novel, as do the problems of the uneasy friendship between Ellis and Boggs. The only big things that are missing on page 69 are the two other principal characters: Ellis' half-brother, Christopher, who died in his youth and haunts everyone, and Heather, a young woman who comes to a difficult position at the center of the knot that ties all the characters together in their tragedies and struggles.
We get it, you have good lungs. It’s a group thing, we don’t want to just hear you.
He gave me a gift.
. . . your life is hidden with Christ in God —Colossians 3:3
Steve Mitchell, playing an NYPD patrolman, bravely
I mentioned the other day that my digestion was off. This has continued, so today, after finishing a plate of birthday pancakes, I started the Kitchari Cleanse with optional Colon Cleansing! Yeah! Sounds exciting right? Actually, I’m finding that the kitchari tastes great and feels like it’s just what my body needs. And the added side benefit? Less cooking! I know that with my love of gardening, and mozzarella, and parsnips,and boiling up pig’s heads, I might seem like I love cooking, but mostly I don’t. I’ve never loved cooking, and though I’ve come to a truce with it, and have gotten excited about all the cool things I can make, it still feels like a time-consuming chore to make sure everyone is fed every day at appropriate times.
After the State of the Union speech and the instant analyses on television and the punditry that follows on newspaper’s editorial pages and, of course, on news/opinion websites and countless blogs and forums, the tendency is likely to dwell on how it portends more of the same bad policies.
Here's some pics:
The Apprentice star and founder of Amstrad told the London Evening Standard at the time that he was flattered by the poll, but there were many conflicts with his numerous business interests.
The Comme des Garcons Fall/Winter 2012 collection was resplendent in bizarre punk Edwardian waistcoats of clashing plaids, polka dots, occasionally draped in waist coats, capes and pleated skirts. Designer Rei Kawakubo forsakes the dandyism of a Galliano or Westwood by investing a more hard-boiled glam/punk appearance to her models, all the way down to Keith Richards/Ron Wood/Jeff Beck wigs.
Fold overhang in to form double thick sides. Press tart edges to raise dough 1/8 inch above pan. Chill for 30 minutes.
Since Gov. Christine Gregoire‘s passionate speech launching a push for full marriage equality in Washington state, things have moved forward quickly. Enough members of the Washington House and Senate have indicated support for a marriage equality bill to make its passage very likely. It looks like our neighbor to the north will become the seventh state to offer full equality to same-sex couples some time this year.
We wanted to share a crudo so we got the pink snapper with Meyer lemon and Szechuan peppercorns:
Fabric--there is always miles and miles of beautiful fabric. Of course in Paducah you have the fabulous people at Hancock's of Paducah. They are SO prepared for the onslaught of shoppers! They are friendly and helpful so if you ever have the chance--make sure you go to Hancock's of Paducah. Actually, the Chamber of Commerce must give a talk to everyone in Paducah on being extra friendly to the quilters because there is no place more hospitable than Paducah during Quilt Week.
I carried him to the bathroom and J tried to help me get him cleaned up. THAT wasn't happening. Monk told J in no uncertain terms, "Go in da udder woom!" We finally peeled his sweaty bloody clothes off at least and got him in something cooler. During the screaming, we were able to look in his mouth. No broken teeth, but a big hunk missing out of the inside of his lip. As I was struggling to wipe his face off, I found the missing piece. On his forehead. Oops.
And day, Thy death therein, is changed to night.
(Now that I look at it- the two giveaways actually coordinate quite well!! NOT planned- but nice!)
I can almost always handle doing 1 big thing a day. Usually, I am able to do much more than that, but I always get frustrated with myself if I don't get everything done that I was expecting of myself. So, I simply lower my expectations, prioritize what HAS to get done during the day and be sure I do that before I am too tired. Anything and everything else I get done is just extra and makes me feel good that I've done so much! :)
spiritual realm of God.
So, who am I?
And it's hard to remember a time the awards shows were not about the clothes. The red carpet has become a staple and the fashions get equal if not more emphasis than the actual films themselves. A gown can make or break both an actress and designer's career and stylists have become the new power and image brokers in Hollywood (be sure to check out the Ruth La Ferla's New York Times piece on The Power Stylists of Hollywood). Countless hours will be spent dissecting, scrutinizing and analyzing hits and misses and heaven forbid two actresses wear the same gown. It's often excruciating watching the red carpet interviewers come up with questions ("How was the ride over in the limo" makes for compelling journalism) and I suspect every campus in America could have a field day using the word "amazing" for their drinking game.
Oct 29-30- Red Deer Royals – KDM Exteriors
for over 50 years.
59. SLEEPER
The Reserve Bank suspended electronic banking a month ago, making it impossible for international organizations to pay for goods and services with bank transfers. The Reserve Bank has also severely limited cash withdrawals from commercial banks. And the inflation rate has rendered check payments nearly worthless by the time they clear days later.
Calls arose out of Mr. Roopnarines actions this week to start investigations to link all such of his activities over the past Seven years.
And he’s not the only one who needs her. Savage enemies seething with dark magic are hunting her. A daring, determined revolutionary thinks she could be his people’s savior. And he looks at her in a way that no man has ever looked at her before. Soon it is not just her life, but her very heart that is at stake.
“Ok.” John ran to the driver’s seat and put the car in gear while leaning on the brake. He had no need for the gas pedal as the idle supplied sufficient power to inch forward. He slowly let up on the brake and kept his head out of the window.
into images for the relief of the body
I smile because when I left my last job I noticed some people were like erm smug...I don't know if that is the correct word to use but I felt those people were probably smiling instead and thought of me as a waste of space who didn't even finish her probation. ERM I got news for them - I DON'T WANT TO WORK IN A S.H.I.T.E CALL CENTRE...OOH YOU GET A SEMI DECENT WAGE PACKAGE AND A BONUS BUT I PREFER A CAREER THAN A POXY JOB okay! Ooh my rant is not aimed at any of my friends in a call centre and they should not take an offence of this, oooh and the gentleman I'm romantically involved with works in a call centre..yeah he should ignore my rant...Actually he shouldn't be reading this LOL :S
This site allows individuals who suffer from depression or are close to a person who suffers to find information about the kinds of depression and treatment options. The intent is to provide users with knowledge so that they can feel less discouraged when dealing with depression. There are other publications available through the site.
New years is only one thing for me this year! a 3 day weekend WOO! Mums in Victoria right now, visiting with Aunty Dewey. Wonder how Deweys CT scan went....
7. Cyprus 80
carefully place the ropes on cookie sheet. i have found it easier to roll the dough out on a chopping board and then carefully roll it/transfer to the sheet.
But on to my new challenge...
My lack of ability makes me even more grateful for women with the ability. Without them, my kids would have been playing with an uncooked spaghetti noodle on Wednesday.
There's no pre-race environment quite like what goes on before a GOTR race. There's a big outdoor stage at the race start, and it was full of girls dancing like crazy to all manner of upbeat music - current stuff, line-dance favorites, and of course "Girls Just Wanna Have Fun". I met the site coaches, but there were no girls near the school's sign - because they were all on stage. I commented that I don't have the energy to both dance AND run a 5k!
Su admitted he had hesitated in lodging a report and speaking up for fear losing his job. He only decided to do so on Monday.
Thomas Anthony Casoria, 29, New York, N.Y.
Unfortunately, where the Victorians are concerned, the discussion and documentation of prostitution and prostitutes posed some huge ideological problems. Whilst prostitution was considered by many as a necessary evil, prostitutes embodied antithesis of the period’s ‘ideal women’ (the meek, maternal and obedient middle-class wife and mother). The very existence of prostitutes such as Lydia Lloyd challenged ideas about the natural morality and sexual passivity of women – and thus Victorian commentators had to provide not just damnation of these abominable women, but more importantly an explanation for their existence.
Temps have been in the high seventies and eighties the last few days. Yuck.
It would have to be someone from the distant past: Richard Burton, Alan Bates, Peter O'Toole - those kinds of guys
Will I be at City Hall on Friday with my camera taking a sh*tload of photos and finding more families to talk to? Hell YES.
Psalm 34:9… “O fear the LORD, ye his saints: for there is no want to them that fear him” (KJV). The word “want” means “deficiency, impoverishment, lack, need, penury, poor, poverty.” God does not want you poor… Keeping you “in want” is not part of God’s vocabulary… In God there is abundance. If you are in want… check to see what are the causes for that want… Deal with the cause… Is it lack of education? Then educate yourself… We are in the computer age… the world is at your fingertips… David uses the word “fear” again, or awe, reverence… The fear (awe) of the Lord is the beginning of wisdom. God is a God of supply… ”In the heart of man… a cry… In the heart of God… supply…”
Femininity: I already had several articles in my file folder on this topic, and I bookmarked a couple more this month.
When we were in France last summer we visited a macaroon museum. Yes really. The French have a museum for everything and anything including almond macaroons.
The East Bay Humane Society in Berkeley was gutted by a fire last night. 12 cats died, which absolutely breaks my heart...those poor little babies. All the other cats and all of the dogs were rescued, thankfully, but they are in desperate need of temporary homes, and donations, as well as help cleaning up later. If you can foster or help them out with cleaning and repairs later, email them at foster@berkeleyhumane.org right now. If you can donate, please go to http://www.berkeleyhumane.org/ and click on any of the donate buttons to help them out.
Each fortnight, all three of us will be posting an update on the books we receive to place under the tree. Our thoughts and Picture Evidence.
VI.
Here's the Spring 2012 version!!
Tales of power — horror stories —
Starting from drinking straws and trophies for sport accomplishments,
CATALOG: MTN-20 / SUZ-01
But I don't believe that over time human nature has changed that much; music and its impact upon us hasn't changed that much either ("If music be the food of love, play on..." - Shakespeare); and if anyone doubts the importance of emotion in music, why don't they just listen to a bit of Monteverdi? Hear Orfeo's great aria 'Possente spirto', then try telling me its composer didn't write to express emotion and see if your ears don't turn red.
Desmond and Jack share important dialogue before Desmond descends into the light cavern.
“Here he turns to another subject, though without at all leaving behind his characteristic rootedness in the local realities of Carmarthenshire.
The crowd stopped laughing immediately.
“Really? But Tigerli, isn’t quite normal, Betty!”
It is not unusual for us to just get out of the house around 2:00 pm ..
Since I didn't have a whole bunch ramekins of the same size, I used four 3.5-inch ramekins, two 3-inch ramekins, and then improvised with four additional 3-inch cake rings with which I lined the bottom with aluminum foil. I buttered all of these and then dusted them with cocoa powder.
Tuesday, March 22 - Uptown Theater - Calgary, ALB
I was a bully’s dream. I was timid and skinny. I was one of the only Jewish kids in school and yes, I had pennies thrown at me. I had a small face and a big nose. I was called every name in the book: The nose knows nothing. The nose who inhaled Tokyo. Nosenstein. Clinger.
I tried AT&T two more times and each time, after navigating their system for several minutes, I finally got through to an actual person. Of course, when I finally got a person on the phone, they didn't speak English! I guess they might technically have been speaking English, but it was so broken that it might as well have been Greek or Ubbi Dubbi. Why? Why is this? And why do these people act so annoyed that you're bothering them with your obviously stupid questions? Where's the customer service? From the cashier at the grocery store, to the floor help at the clothing store, to the customer service rep. on the other end of the phone, more often than not I encounter someone rude, annoyed, or seemingly bored. What, can no one smile? Can nobody be helpful? Can't anyone at least pretend to care about your needs?
We are seeking creative non-fiction essays from young people with disabilities ages 13-30 (some flexibility will be available for compelling submissions from individuals slightly outside our preferred age range). People with all types of disabilities are welcome to submit. Speaking from personal experience is strongly encouraged. The intent of this project is to use personal voices to capture the experience of the new generation of young people with disabilities.
brought jars of each kind to the houses on either side of ours and have received similar feedback. winnie's production has ramped up to nearly 4 gallons of milk a day which leaves us with plenty to perform such mindless experiments.
Eldorado Mt. via Rattlesnake Gulch and NW Ridge. Really slow-going in places but got lots of practice on boulder fields. Most notably, I actually ran the last 26min back down to town with only minor protest from my post-tib/soleus. Definitely progress. All the rest was hiking, of course, which was especially frustrating on the way up the initial shallow grades.
Less than a month until we leave for NY. I'm nervous to travel with my two kids alone, but it will be fun and I can't wait to see dads and babies again!
Ok, so that being my opinion, I still wanted a way to have kids and parents come together and work on "school stuff" in the evening. Parents are strong teachers and I wanted them to play an important and purposeful role in their child's learning.
And so, I began to research antique "Lover's Eyes".
Down and away below.
Of late, I’ve been confining new DVD purchases to non-region-1 titles. Recent acquisitions in that department include: A Man Vanishes (Imamura, 1967), Before the Revolution (Bertolucci, 1964), Sparrow (Johnnie To, 2008), Our Beloved Month of August (Gomes, 2008), Deep End (Skolimowski, 1970), The Hunter (Pitts, 2010), On Tour (Amalric, 2010), The Banishment (Zviagintsev, 2007), Red Psalm (Jansco, 1972), I for India (Suri, 2005), Up the Junction (Collinson, 1968), De bruit et de fureur (Brisseau, 1988), and vol. 1 of the new Humphrey Jennings collection.
Sent: Monday, March 05, 2012 12:15 PM
Singing in her song she died,
When we’re gone they’ll live on cloned endlessly
"Float" scallops in individual bowls of Soup and add a bit of Fresh grated Parmesan Cheese.
“Bad writing is more than a matter of shit syntax and faulty observation; bad writing usually arises from a stubborn refusal to tell stories about what people actually do — to face the fact, let us say, that murderers sometimes help old ladies cross the street.” – Stephen King, On Writing
-What is the State of Consulting Market Today? Examining the Opportunities and Trends that will Drive Growth in the Future
There is the further problem that even if one did find a change using the above approaches one couldn't assign that effect solely to the power of prayer. It could be that the mere presence of a vigil has such an effect. To test this they would need to hold a vigil during which the participants do not pray. Should we still see a change, then one couldn't say the effect was due to prayer*. The real test though would be to have a prayer vigil that was in close proximity to abortion providers but not visible to anyone on the street or in the clinic, say a next door office building. That would get to the heart of the power of prayer* in this context.
Attorney Evolutionist: I object your honor. It is a fact that site after site has yielded indisputable evidence that man came from monkeys! Monkeys that share our DNA. Ask Goo about his many tools; the tools he used to get to where he is now.
In Outland you can purchase the ice cream from your faction innkeeper in Nagrand.
The Farmer’s Market is a great place to introduce your children to fresh fruits and vegetables and local eating. Developing healthy eating habits for your children is much easier when they are exposed to new and different fruits and vegetables and can actually talk with the people who grow them! There is something about the bright colored booths and the baskets of produce that just makes kids want to try something new. Striking up a conversation about the produce with the farmers and asking questions about their farm helps kids to understand what farm fresh is, especially for those of us that really are “city folk”. You would be surprised how many children really do not know what a fresh peach looks like, or that carrots actually grow in the ground and don’t come out of a bag all washed and trimmed!
-“aha! you ‘re talking about Salima”
The Easter Fire:
I have some super news for you today, you may have already noticed it in my sidebar but if not i'll tell you. I have been asked to join the team over at Cardmadfairy's Digi Days Challenge. Their challenges run fortnightly on a Friday and you need to use a Digi Image in your creation, other than following the challenge theme thats it.
Given the competitiveness of the market, both the total number of suites and the average price per suite assumed by FCRC appear to be on the high end relative to other similar arenas. NBA arenas average approximately ninety suites. Facilities in Chicago, Detroit, Los Angeles, Dallas, Toronto, and Philadelphia are the only ones that offer more than 125 suites. Other than the Palace at Auburn Hills in Detroit, all of these facilities host both NBA and NHL teams.
When I read Hofmeyr’s account I was delighted, as it appeared to support an idea that I had developed independently. Drawing on my insights as a teacher of the Alexander Technique (AT), I devised a series of movements that combines dynamically the knee–chest position with kneeling on all fours. Over several years I have taught this technique at my special AT and movement classes for pregnant women, and my experience suggests that it is effective. Of course, in the absence of a scientific statistical study it cannot be ruled out that the cases where it seems to have worked were just a series of lucky turns. Proper research will be required in order to reach firmer conclusions. Be that as it may, most childbirth educators will agree that these movements have several beneficial effects during pregnancy and in childbirth, irrespective of the baby’s position.
Rosemary here and my project is a paper pieced card. I decided to use a flourish as an element in my motif, it's the branch that my owl is perched upon.. There are flourishes in the patterned paper background as well.
I'm reducing wear and tear on my car
Thia wus, fur sure, the days befair thar wur folk here in Ulster, so how dae we knaw aboot them? The answer is that people who larn about DINOSAURS!!!! called Palaeontalogits have foun' bits o' them as far an' wide as North and South Antrim, shewin' us that these great bastes once bestrode oor land. The Palaeontalogits have foun' fossils*** - bits o' bone that they hoke oot o' the very rock - that can tell us a great dail aboot the way DINOSAURS!!!! lived thar days, richt down tae the very food they ate and the type o' things they liked tae dae. Mostly they liked til ate.
Most people associate Maritime with who they used to be: Emo pioneers The Promise Ring. Maritime is pretty sweet as well. Not nearly as good as The Promise Ring, but still awesome. And I have to admit, at times this is precisely why I listened to them in the first place and have continued to pay attention to them over the years. Yeah they put out 2 really good records since their debut but it felt like they hadn’t quite reached their potential yet. Maritime began as 1/2 The Promise Ring - Davey and Dan with 1/3 The Dismemberment Plan Eric Axelson. One would expect similarities to The Promise Ring - however Davey and Dan managed to create a unique sound of indie pop. The debut EP titled Adios was released in 2003 of Foreign Leisure - the bands own label. The EP was just a start up for the full length premier of The Glass Floor - a witty, earnest display of pop punk - very clear a new beginning for members coming from prestigious bands.
I held on to this post for a bit and an entire season managed to pass before getting around to it. October and November are usually busy months for people in general, those months seem to revolve around preparing for holidays and doing strange things like looking for things on sale that we don't really need but really can't pass up the opportunity to buy at a reduced price. Fortunately, I have managed to buy very little this shopping season in terms of random items, though it was tempting. Since the holidays passed, a handful of larger snowstorms hit the East cost and buried most of everything in snow. It seems as though layers and layers of snow piles on the same half melted or unmelted piles every other week making for ugly monuments and to no surprise, the loss of parking spaces. When it snows around here, it makes for pretty messy commutes and extends the day because public transportation will have some delays. At the end of the day, I feel less motivated to update despite still collecting and trying new brews.
And I’d be bumming food off of my dates, too. “You gonna eat that?” would be the catch-phrase of the season.
Did I mention the film contains moments of humor that are almost as silly as a Buster Keaton film?
It's kinda hard not to idolize someone who's handed you back your life.......
ground squirrels and ticks.
Barrack Obama did something dumb today. And he wasted millions of dollars in tax money today.
He stumbled upon the answer while he was recruiting at the International Conference for Young Scientists in Alexandria, Egypt. One impressive young man, fresh out of grad school and still working on his doctorate, had given a fascinating presentation on the potential of retroviruses. With their ability to invade and insert their own DNA into host cells, they were the perfect vehicle for transferring engineered genetic material into anyone, anyone at all. Dr. Randall offered the lad a six-figure salary on the spot, and arranged to have him begin working at the lab the following Monday.
This push and pull continued even as the marketing tool of the new millennium, the viral video, was utilized by the promoters of the film. The setting of the first clip, a future TED conference in 2023, was a really great idea, and it showed there was some thought put into the pre-history of the prequel itself, but the content of the speech was overdramatized and Guy Pearce's execution was poor.
So he sexually assaults/rapes Barb on top of paralyzing her. Not for any grand scheme. He just wants to hurt the Gordons.
One obviously bad option would have been to withdraw from the euro, default on a mountain of debt and slowly climb back from a deep economic depression. Officials in Athens decided to go with a worse option — stay with the euro, impose Draconian austerity, muzzle anyone who utters the word default — that also sent the country into a deep economic depression with no apparent way out.
Suffice to say the full list of wasted dollars is staggering.
Keep in mind I had somewhat given up on the project so pictures will be hit and miss.
Sinful Colors Zeus from the Spring 2012 Cast Away collection
As it turned out, M was upset about seeing his previous Educational Assistant last week. The EA had surgery recently and his recovery has taken longer than expected.. School Board hiring practices are incredibly complicated but since it is a temporary position, the Principal had to fill it. The EA will be coming into the school on a part-time basis; on those days, he’ll be with M. But they have been together since last spring, and M is emotionally attached to him. So while he was happy to see the EA last week, he was upset about not being with him this week.
Amaya entered the car, and waited until Rio was finished with his tattle tale session about a friend using inappropriate language at school. Then she informed me on the new policies their school's going to implement next year in regards to bullies. Rio has been the victim of bullying, so it's a topic I have very strong opinions about.
Remember this name, because in 20 years she will be the best known professional in American sexuality.
Chef Paul isn't the only one there with a with license to be creative. Chef Philip Speer has also come up with some pretty fantastic desserts. This one is the fig, chocolate and curry. This combination of coconut curry, chocolate cameaux , dehydrated figs, candied figs, and fig sorbet was a mish-mash of interesting, traditionally unrelated flavors and textures, that turned into a delicious combination. This dessert was so tasty that I made a macaron based off of the combinations. I created some coconut curry macarons filled with fig chocolate. I used confituras's fig and walnut conserve in the chocolate for the macarons.
However, one day, out of the blue, the idea of writing my own story, with my own characters, ambushed me while I was running in the foothills near my house. A story about a young hero rising above a brutal past with the help of others along the way, with whiffs of fantasy and history and philosophy and even a love story. Maybe something with ... with ... with angels.
as it scrapes the earth
The School Superintendent was paid $163,246 in 2004 - only $1,500 less than the head of the Mass State Department of Education. He gave us one of the three worst school districts in Massachusetts. A district that gets more state aid than any other department in the state and still fails.
13. Unschoolers are prepared for the world because they've always lived in it.
Change TV to radio and make the leading lady (Rachel Adams) shorter (and give her a uni-brow and overbite) and you have an enthusiastic me in my twenties trying to make a morning radio show with cooking tips and global news and music. We had our adventures on the show and there was never a dull moment be it a good one or bad.
“Anytime they send pictures, you can do locates on the phone, do GPS ‘where are they now?’ And you can also listen in, even when they are not talking on their phone. So, it’s an active bug,” said Robert Kresson of Empire Investigations.
"I wouldn't have needed to look right at it." Rel realised he was letting the other man bait him. He clenched his jaw and forced himself to calm down. At least he didn't feel hungry anymore. "What is it down there?"
P.P.P.S: Next time I'll make these again but coat one side of the biscuit with chocolate. Can't wait to dunk those in a glass of milk! mmmmm!
The first thing to notice is what is not on the list. It does not say these people are justified. This list also does not mention the new birth or any synonyms associated with the new birth. It does not say that these people are: born again, born from above, or regenerated. It does not even specifically say that these people are saved. In fact, none of the phrases used in the Bible to identify a Christian is used in this list. And what is here is not necessarily taking about salvation.
Published by Walker Books, and translated from the French by Sarah Adams, this is a handsome paperback with flaps and a silky finish to the cover. And it's illustrated throughout by Quentin Blake. What more could you ask?
I didn't dare tell him how much I admired the eyesore or how relieved I was that nobody had torn it down.
p.s. Be sure to check out Ken Lambert’s blog, which is sourced in the second paragraph for more information about the book as well as the project itself. And for purchase, click on the photo in the upper left. Also be sure to never forget the most influential Christian of all… Jesus Christ! Happy Ressurrection Day!
This month at Kraft It Up it's all about Christmas, so lets get into the spirit, we want to see a layout about your Christmas traditions. There doesn't have to be heaps, it can be just one or it can be more it is totally up to you. Make sure you have a photo of your tradition(s) and that your layout is created on Kraft or Kraft PP.IT'S CHRISTMAS So lets get in to the Chrissy Spirit!!! I want to see a layout about your Christmas Traditions. You don't have to do a few traditions you can pick your favourite it is totally up to you. We need you to have a photo of your tradition and your creation must be on Kraft Cardstock or Kraft Patterned Paper...
The practice was a small core of peeps. We knew that we would have to take on leadership roles and be on task to guide the crowd that showed up on Monday. I was put in charge of starting The Soul Train Line after the MJ Dance was complete. We also knew that when The Po Po showed up the boom box would be cut off and you had better haul ass or act like you were a tourist just caught up in the moment. What officer? I heard music and got boogie fever, I’m just out here enjoying my day off.
BODACIOUS SPACE PIRATES: The Japanese title is MOURETSU PIRATES, or Moupai in short. Actually, it’s based on a novels series titled MINISUKA PIRATES. Both the anime and the novels titel would suggest a hentai story (minisuka referring to miniskirt and moupai sounding similar to oppai – breasts). But I’ve heard it’s suprisingly different and good. Can’t quite think of in what way or how the story should go (female pirates in space?!?) but EXACTLY the reason why I’m so curious!
I love my GP--she's unflappable, answers my panicky questions in a way that is both reassuring and not at all condescending, and doesn't give me unnecessary grief. She does, however, seem to consider herself a teaching doctor, so it is not unusual for there to be a med student or nurse-in-training trailing along or attempting, somewhat nervously, to take a medical history and listen to my pulse.
After airbrushing the danger room and the digital sentinels, the mask was peeled off, and shadows were added to his skin to add dimension. Next, I took a toothpick and scraped contour lines into the shadows I had just made to add reflective highlights. I then outlined him in black, comic book style, and painted the contour lines across his arms and legs, following the lines I had scraped into his shadows.
Now onto our new challenge! The challenge is FOR MEN! We'd love to see your manly projects, for boys and any special guy in your life. The sponsor this week is Digis with Attitude!
So, that plateau. I let several stressful life events be my excuse to eat with abandon and stop exercising. However, I never stopped going to meetings, or being aware of myself in that time, and I'm back on track now. I joined the softball team at work, and am walking three 5K races in the month of May, so I'm training for those now. I haven't started tracking again, except for a few days at a time in half-hearted attempts. I am making better choices at the grocery store, going meatless at home (because it works for me, not preaching here), and upping the activity for now. Baby steps, people. Baby steps.
is getting married!
Author: Jill Eileen Smith
According to credible sources in South Waziristan (Pakistan;s tribal area) who requested not to be named, few helicopters were seen entering Pakistan territory from neighbouring Afghan province of Paktia, close to Pak-Afghan border which landed on Pakistani soil and evacuated Qari Hussain and a few others, then departed immediately towards Afghanistan.
-This morning he was looking for a key to his toy suitcase and he remembered that it was outside on the lawn chair. HE remembered! Pretty freakin’ awesome milestone.
In short, never underestimate the power of music in cinematography. If you care to look hard enough you can spot the sonorous patterns that are used as potent emotive cues time and time again. They can attempt to be subliminal in nature, and plenty remain that way. But they still blatantly heighten our sensory experience of any and all film, and will continue to be skillfully utilized in future productions.
Anyway, I always figured I'd have a cat someday, but when my oldest son turned out to be allergic, we opted instead for a series of little caged critters: mice, a hamster, a guinea pig, a chinchilla, a whole mess of roly poly bugs.
As a linguistics major, I have developed a nervous tic from seeing far too many pieces of writing advice that are just plain wrong. It irks me to no end because people read it and parrot it and it spreads faster than a 4chan meme.
MARCH 25 2009 – RUSTENBURG, NW. Detective-inspector D Smit of the Phokeng Organised Crime unit near Rustenburg/Buffelshoek, North West province reports that one of the four men who had been arrested in connection with the murder of Afrikaner farmer Jeremiah Harman on 31 January 2007, of the farm Buffelshoek on the Kommiessiedrift road, has een sentenced to life imprisonment.
Numerous studies over the last 30 years have suggested that personality is a powerful predictor of a person's life satisfaction.
Palette & Brush, ART piece, & Pennant: Locker Talk
These social networks we create when we are younger have upsides like the one described before. They also help us find love and employment. Since we seem to be connected ad infitum, our future partner should ideally be three persons away according to the Six Degrees of Kevin Bacon game whilst our dream job should just be around the corner. But that's not real life. We know better than to make these assumptions.
still clasping
I used the paperback cover image for Alone to create the banner and had a change of fonts and colours. For some reason I can't get the twitter updates to be visible, but I'm working on it!
Pushing Mary Away?
In the meantime, I'll just shrug and paint more moody landscapes.
Waited for rain, while the black clouds
For plenty of Rigid Heddle news, keep up with The Rigid Heddle on tumblr. It's a weblog linking you to all the rigid heddle sites and notes I come across online. Great fun!
Upland Maibock
Driving past the site numerous times however, was the worrying sight of new tamac being laid on the Common on Stadium Road - and its apparant permanent status. Todays Royal Greenwich Time clears up something that local blogs have picked up on already, which is that this tarmac is going to be an extra car park for the Queen Elizabeth Hospital and is not connected to the Olympics. As the site is on that of the old Woolwich Stadium (visible in satellite images http://g.co/maps/xg3kw) it was considered brownfield site and not part of the rest of the site which is Metropolitan Open land. While anyone who has tried to park at the hospital at busy times would agree that there is a need for extra car park spaces, I am not clear as to why there has been such a delay between the planning decision in 2009 and the construction now in 2012? There appears to be no mention of it on the Council website (too long ago?) and no mention of it on the Defra site either. Hopefully this will be the only permanent change to the Common.
And I can't afford this superstition any longer.
Furthermore, the ruling government’s refusal to reciprocate with Bersih in ensuring the nation’s elections are conducted in a neutral manner has only made the situation tense.
Bakugan is about a different world but the people are like us. They are trying to save their world from destruction. The Bakugan are spheres that can turn into different animals. Some of them look like turtles, dragons, and birds. The Bakugan fight against the bad guys to protect the world.
I can’t name all the alternatives for expensive proprietary applications that you can use. You can always find one if you have the will. Sourceforge can surely help you.
